The Christian reply will be that the _canonized_ bible is infaillable, and that your version isn't canon (and therefore faillable)  
Just look at alins previous posts:  http://reddit.com/user/alins/submitted Freakin propaganda and he's flooding reddit with crap and lies.   
Well, I guess that depends on whether you regard HTML as being related to programming or not. Because in case you do, even Jakob Nielsen will chuckle at that joke... :-)
I thought my submission of Steve Ballmer going crazy in a Windows commercial would be popular: http://www.askmen.com/video/2005_oct/oct04_steve_ballmer.html
Polish parliament prays for rain: http://reddit.com/info/ajvj/comments So much for a secular government of Poland
I am sure tons of people search that far back in Reddit to come up with an interesting article. I don't see any rules on relisting articles.
[Movie spoofs about water quality](http://www.bryantx.gov/departments/?name=water)
The history of the car bomb began with zionists:  "[T]he Stern Gang drove a truckload of explosives into a British police station in Haifa, Palestine, killing four and injuring 140. The Stern Gang (a pro-fascist splinter group led by Avraham Stern that broke away from the right-wing Zionist paramilitary Irgun) would soon use truck and car bombs to kill Palestinians as well: a creative atrocity immediately reciprocated by British deserters fighting on the side of Palestinian nationalists."
A useful tool for secret service of all stripes: "Anonymity, in addition, greatly recommends car bombs to those who like to disguise their handiwork, including the CIA, the Israeli Mossad, the Syrian GSD, the Iranian Pasdaran, and the Pakistani ISI – all of whom have caused unspeakable carnage with such devices."
Difference is antiwar.com publish original stuff or republish with permission, c2ore linkjacks en masse.
I see you still live in the ivory tower. Us down in the valley deal with poorly written code day in and day out. A few months back I was looking at a report that made a seperate database call for ever line of the report. The "engineer" was too lazy to spend the extra 15 minutes to fix the original query. While he didn't cite "premature optimization", it would explain his behaviour.   
Giant electrical storms on Mars make hydrogen peroxide snow, which kill any potential microbes that might have been there. And you thought the weather here was awful.
It's funny /and/ misogynistic.
SI? Sports Illustrated?
they should have down the same with the stormtrooper next to him
I don't think any article that describes alcohol, tobacco and marijuana as "stimulants" deserves to be taken seriously.
acid doesnt permanently change your brain chemistry, i think is the point.
Exactly what I was thinking when I read it. Now they're suffering and starving to death because of that.
The same one as any where laws and lawyers exist.
I don't know where you are but if you're in the US then it's in fact *more* humane than yours.
I thought this was going to be about Global Warming.
Sad story. I don't know though if I'm the only one amused by the BBC's video title " \t  BBC NEWS: VIDEO AND AUDIO  See the abandoned cows in their field". Haha. There's something... er... amusing about this title.
I'd forgotten I'd switched the blink tag off in my browser (about:config | browser.blink_allowed = false).  To think, I've been less aggravated than all those poor IE users and I didn't even realise.  I love Firefox!
This would be a cool application of a greasemonkey script. I agree that it's a bad idea to attempt such a thing though.
C2ore linkjacked it on 4/14/06. The original is from http://www.tomdispatch.com/index.mhtml?pid=76140 on 4/12/06. Many of Tom Engelhardt edited articles appear on antiwar WITH permission. This one appeared on 4/13/06, one day after it appeared on Tom's site, and one day before it appeared on c2ore.
What's this about? Getting single home owners into Stalinist style communal housing, because they "waste energy". Let me ask you *WHOSE ENERGY IS IT, FUCKERS?* Who bought it by paying the bill? It's theirs to waste, isn't it? And then they don't even have the decency to have comments section on the page where people can tell them what sort of collectivist fucks they are.
The main reason to buy organic isn't your health, it's the health of the ecosystem.  That's my understanding anyway.
very nice, thank you
The single most common argument for Christianity that I've heard is, "IT'S TRUE!!! UNLIKE THOSE OTHER RELIGIONS, CHRISTIANITY IS TRUE! JESUS LOVES YOU! [insert some random Bible verse here, probably John 3:16 or something similar]" Startling numbers of Christians don't bother to provide any reasoning other than a bald-faced assertion, and *they expect this to be good enough for anybody*. Sometimes they actually quote from the Bible when asked why you should believe the Bible....
All they are doing is reporting about some research that was conducted. Why is that so bad? If you don't agree with the research, then just ignore it.
Maybe now would be a good time to reaffirm my vow to the principle of non contradiction.
Well, you said "The West should be pouring billions of dollars into research". Now, business as distinct from government does things not (or not only) because they "should", but because they reckon it will be profitable. Thinking about what that means: a profit happens if what's made is more valuable than what's used. Therefore, business will only attempt things that stand a good chance of *creating value*. Thinking about what subsidy means: an economic activity is not profitable, that is it's *destroying value*. Left to its own devices it would fall into bankruptcy, and stop doing harm. However, in subsidy the state takes money from value creators and uses it to make this value-destroying industry continue. This is why I'm "pessimistic" about subsidy.
The way a voiceless "unbiased" entity speaks its biases is to pick and choose what to accentuate, over and over again. Not to mention, the assumptions implied by of the questions they ask. When did you stop beating your wife? When will you stop wasting "your" energy?
Any decent-sized company puts good negotiators in charge of their purchasing. They usually get pretty sweet deals, too, due to bulk volume or to foster an ongoing business relationship.
&gt;have fun gettin raped by your spaghetti and meatball, FAKE god. Christian theology is often interesting in its sheer absurdity: - "The bread *literally* changes into the body of Jesus.  Not *figuratively*.  But *literally*.  What's that you ask? Well no, of *course* it didn't turn into human flesh.  And of *course* it's still bread.  But it's *literally* changed! By which I mean, um... shut up, you heathen!" - "They're three gods, which are one god! By which I mean, um... shut up, you heathen!" - And now, perhaps most interestingly, "Your *fake* god is going to rape you! What's that you ask? How can a *fake* god do something? Um... shut up, you heathen!"
I'm sorry your experience with Christians and politics turned you off completely to Jesus. I've been going to a church where the pastor presented a great argument in favor of the separation of church and state. (see here: http://theberkeleymosaic.org/sermons/politics/) The problem isn't that NO Christians haven't embraced the separation of church and state, but more like SOME of them haven't, and the rest follow.
I've had clerks check my idea and call my card into question because Iowa IDs are intelligible to people in other states. Iowa prints your last name on a different line than your first and middle names and throws an extra coma in so it looks like your middle name is your first name and your first is your last name. Last  First, Middle  (With the pictures, holograms, and colors added it’s a lot less clear than it is on screen) I usually just feel hassled and annoyed when this happens, but I guess I should be glad because it means they are actually checking 
I can't stand answers.com
Registration and login required... that sux!
Even after watching this video there will be useful idiots in the West saying the problem is not with Islam but with America, Britain, and Israel. People who are filled with such self-loathing are pitiful creatures indeed.
The more interesting charts are further down the page...
I started three days ago.  Pretty much everything I submitted got voted up and then subsequently down.  Some never survived the downmod and stayed at zero, which is probably really minus something. http://reddit.com/user/skykam/submitted   
I wonder, are those folks paying for the REAL cost of the energy they are wasting? Is it all factored in there? Just because you can buy soemting does no mean it makes sense to do so... and... stalin had a penchant for taking barges full of people out to sea and drowning them all... hardly even anything like suggesting that single people living alone with lots of free cash use more energy than people in shared accomadation...the article says nothing about forcing them, it suggests advertising, which means I guess, that all the ad houses that peddle all the useless crap these people buy are bastions of stalinism...?   
Do you really have to ask? Hint: $$$
Am I missing something here? If you massively reduce the half-life (which already seems highly questionable), then you'd massively increase the energy output. Its tricky enough to contain fissile material as it is.
Anyone notice the short, Chaplin/Hitler-esque moustaches? I counted four. (Not to mention the overwhelming majority of moustaches in general there!) (I know, fashion and all... but a curios coincidence!)
It has been popular for years, and there's better places to watch it than askmen.com
Not everyone in America is going to roll over and let Islam have its way with us.  There will be retribution for Moslem terrorism and it will be extreme.  They will curse the day they ever heard of Mohammed or Allah.
Ok, I normally never get infuriated by sophomoric down-modding, but seriously, can the neg-voter at least give a reason for his distaste?
Sweet. I'm surprised nobody has offered up an unofficial Arc implementation yet. It would be fun to experiment with, for sure.
An important statistic: &gt;According to the Israeli Defence Forces (IDF), 52 Israelis—19 civilians and 33 soldiers—have died during the conflict. Can Israel claim that there are more Hizbollah fighters killed than kids?
&gt; We could certainly see a reversal when Perl 6 comes out. Noo kidding. Expect the "Perl Is BACK Oh Boy" article as soon as the new Camel Book emerges. Nothing like a horse-race to drum up some excitement.
When will these goddamned idiotic people fucking **get over** the idea of "dirty" words. I can say poop, doodoo, crap, or kaakaa all day long, but I can't say shit. I can say any non-fuck analogue of fuck (bang, screw, whoopee, whatever) and it's fine. It's clear that it's not the *meaning* of these words that is the problem, it's the words themselves. I'm sure I'm preaching to the choir here on reddit, but **listen, people:** there are no bad words, just bad ideas, and bad ideas can be expressed just as plainly with "clean" words as they can with "dirty" words. I could make a perfectly eloquent speech about the need to exterminate [insert hated group] and some of these people wouldn't give a fuck, but if I were to implore them to "fucking love one another" they'd blow their fucking tops. If the cocksuckers who make a *big deal* about these words didn't make such a big deal of them in the first place, they would have no power whatsoever, which would probably make a hell of a lot more progress toward whatever goals those fuckers are trying to achieve than their current mode of behavior. **FUCK ALL OF THEM!**
And one more statistic to show the Israeli myth: &gt; According to the Israeli Defence Forces (IDF), 52 Israelis—19 civilians and 33 soldiers—have died during the conflict. Source: http://www.angus-reid.com/polls/index.cfm/fuseaction/viewItem/itemID/12698 Can "IDF" make the same claim about Civilian/Military casualties it has inflicted on the Lebanniese?
Good writing is evidence of expertise in nothing save good writing.  But it is a sign that you consider what you write to be important, and evidence that you took time and effort to make it clear and correct.  If you don't care enough to use a spellchecker, why should I care enough to read your article?
I do so like people pontificating about the correct way to run elections. As a programmer there is no way I want votes registered by computer.  There is no way to make it fully auditable. The way that seems to work in most countries is to have interested but opposed adjudicators.   In the UK we have an electoral role, not on the role no vote.  At least two people will sit at the front of the voting room and only allow those in that can prove by id they are on the role.  Then you vote on a piece of paper, one mark, usually done in privacy of a booth.  Then you are watched by at least two people as you place your vote in the box. At the end of the day at least two groups will count the votes in full view of anyone who wishes to be there.  When they have confirmed the numbers the phone the results into the central location, sign the paper work. The reason for the use of at least two people is one from each major party plus whoever else wants to be there. The people audit not only the voters but the process as well.  Any funny business and they refuse to consent to the numbers as accurate. So elections take one day, all votes are tallied and checked.  A transparent process that protects the voter from reprisals. Of course if you want some machine that you cannot even audit to do the work then fine just don't call where you live a democracy. 
I should add: my main beef with them isn't bias, although that sucks. Everyone has bias. It's their high handed way of taking their tax funding and throwing their ideas out there like they were the word of god, and providing no serious way of replying and slapping them upside the head for their presumption. As to their "have your say" page (gah, even the name is evil and collectivist), it's a joke. They have this nice system that in theory could have open discussions with moderators trimming the froth and irrelevance. But they universally run it in coward mode, where their staff of censors gets to vet every post, before a "representative selection" are put online. Well pardon me, BBC, but I don't trust your censors not to pick and choose the posts they'd like to hear, and quietly dump anything critical. All very Soviet in style. It pisses me off something fierce!
I wonder how they would handle image collisions in a real world database? Lots of different buildings look very much alike, especially when only small portions of a building are captured in each image. This system could easily find false positive images matches and then assemble some sort of virtual Franken-building out of similar-looking but distinct places. 
THE SMILING LIAR AND THE HAPLESS DOPE  Blair and Bush stand idly by  While Lebanese children scream and die  With arms folded they give no hope  The smiling liar and the hapless dope Such depths of cynicism we rarely see  In callous inaction these two agree  Watching a murderous Israeli squad  Slaughter the innocent in the name of God With what bloody hands and utter disdain  They watch the children die in pain  “Carry on the slaughter, what do we care?”  “A week of bloodbath, it’s only fair” A sophisticated Israeli PR machine  Churns out platitudes while civilians scream  We now see Blair and Bush stand idly by  As innocent children are condemned to die These two “Christians” help their Jewish friends  To perpetrate war crimes for savage ends  With arms folded they give them hope  This smiling liar and hapless dope  SPOT ON!
great links for students, like improving writing, and time management.
Interesting article but the title isn't doing it justice...
excellent series on finding work you love
Have you also caught a glimpse of this dictionary? If so, please add your word to the list so all of us can better understand Rethuglican double-speak!
Here is the video of them:  http://216.120.242.82/%7Egreensp/video.html More physics lectures at:  http://freescienceonline.blogspot.com/2006/07/even-more-physics-videos-and-video.html
You're reading an awful lot into this story. Also, if you consider the negative externalities of energy that isn't accounted for by the cost, then I'd say that energy is not entirely a personal resource. Finally, I find it really hard to get pissed that they don't have a talk-back page given that this article appaers to be pretty minor.  I don't even see it on their front page.
The amusing words of a stupid american... not so?
Perhaps you are mentally ill... I regret having upset you.
I find his lack of black... disturbing.
Yup, I agree. I hate AskMen.com's cluttered interface.
This article is a turd.  If you read the comments on the blog site you will see them ripping him to shreds.
I'm surprised you picked the cat for Schroedinger.  How about his wave equation?  Probably more important.
None of the major papers - it was a self imposed limit on free speech of course.  Nothing to do with fear, all about excercising free speech. /nothing to see here, move along please.
There's an intellectual challenge for someone. Figure out how to break this contract without costing the earth. Perhaps we could add it to the google admissions test? 
No, lets stop being asstards and not call everybody that you disagree with a Nazi.
Of course! The more radioactive the substance is, the more power goes to the cooling system!
Lies, damn lies, statistics and benchmarks. How does the sales of Perl vs. Ruby books match up against the # of new books published, or accepted for publication on each topic, or submitted for consideration on each topic? Are the number of people writing/submitting Perl books also decreasing?
Wow, thanks for the video!
i wonder if they would be just shadows and poor imitations of the real thing, like all the wannabe-rails java frameworks. i'm not saying this to kiss up to paul graham, the simple fact is he's been using lisp longer than i've been alive and that means something if you're designing a lisp.
Well, your making an assumption that we haven't had a majority Christian populace in this country. It was Christian fundamentalists that started the abolitionist movement.  It was Christian fundamentalists that started the preservation movement.  The civil rights movements started in the church. So, if anything Christian majorities in this country have proven how their values would govern society just as Islamic nations have demonstrated their values in governing their people. So do you think a woman having an abortion at birth is a sole right to her?  As I pointed out earlier the gay marriage issue has been popularly voted against in very blue states. You are a coward because you would never insult a follower of Islam the way you would gladly humiliate a Christian.
Here's what the entire article is based on: &gt;[Chuck Hagel] said that in the previous 48 hours, he had received three telephone calls from four-star generals who were "beside themselves" over the Pentagon's reversal of plans to bring tens of thousands of soldiers home this fall...."That isn't going to do any good. It's going to have a worse effect," Hagel said. "They're destroying the United States Army." In other words, a more accurate title would be, "Chuck Hagel says the Pentagon is 'destroying the United States Army' following a phone-call with some generals"
Sweet Nintendo DS browser currently in development.
Yes, those Perl 6 books will fit nicely next to my Duke Nukem Forever manual. *runs off*
It wasn't exactly downmodded but I found [this game](http://reddit.com/info/5g9v/comments) to be super addictive and quite interesting in terms of finding a strategy. It reminds me a bit of the compulsive mental torture of tetris. Other timewasting stuff that might be worth a look if they passed by: * [What is red mercury?](http://reddit.com/info/b1u9/comments)  * [Manglish - original format manga with mouseover English translation](http://reddit.com/info/97e5/comments)  * [Ridiculous metal pics](http://reddit.com/info/bfk8/comments)  * [Big furry rabbits](http://reddit.com/info/51mf/comments)  * [Worst hair on MySpace and the owners' superhero alter-egos](http://reddit.com/info/53lz/comments) 
I'm just stunned that we went to the moon a few times and then *never went back*. I'm 30 years old and there has not been a human being on the moon in my lifetime. Even sadder: The money spent on the Iraq war could have funded *several* manned moon missions. Which is better: Going To The Moon or Blowing People Up?
Look, I know where the Daily WTF is, okay?  If I want to read it, I'll go there myself.
It depends. Most of the time you will spend 50-100% more money on getting the same system as Dell, just because they buy parts in bulk, with really low prices.
Voted up like a flashlight on roaches. 
That's a good idea. I don't know why it got modded down either. I think it's cuz of cliques. * For example, any post about bots gets downmodded -- or at least with an immediate counter-argument. (Why doubt their existence, good sir?)  * No pro-Digg pieces. We only get pro-Reddit propaganda. This is super lame.  * Reddit's majority of articles are anti-Bush and anti-Ann-Coulter and pro-gay-marriage and pro-choice. I may agree with these articles, but I want to hear the other side of the story, to make things interesting. I want to learn how Republicans get rich, for example, and learn how conservatives think.  * Any post about Paul Graham gets modded up. No disrespect to Paul, but is it good for Reddit that he gets rock star status on Reddit? I mean, most people don't know who he is, until they start using Reddit. This is a flaw of democracy (and Reddit is a democracy, I assume) -- it's a popularity contest, and popularity can be manipulated by a minority of influential people. Basically any group which shares a common interest will automatically out-mod the **entire** rest of the un-united group. I just saw a pic of Paul Graham with a Reddit shirt get modded up. This is why Reddit content is so one sided--although I admittedly really enjoy the type of content on it right now. I'm pro-Reddit. That said, we need better than the system we have. Who knows, if you solve it with Reddit, maybe they'll do that with the whole electoral system.
Not a prank, it was a guise.  It was a portrayal of what those  familiar with hollywood sterotypes of a Vietnam type character.   Me tunnel vision?  You are taking the statements of one soldier and qualifying that as an example of a organizational mindset.  If there is anyone with a case of myopia it is you. A reporter is a reporter and a reporter for "Star's and Stripes" is a reporter that is hoping for better than what amounts to an industry trade magazine.  What better way to do that than to catch the attention of the mainstream news?  Give them a story that fits a template and a stereotype of how they see the military.  As with these types this story is confirmation that any Oliver Stone film they have seen is reality. You probably already know this though and thats why my take frustrating for you.
Kind of funny that the mark is made with a pencil.
Oh my god, a Republican with a brain!  I hope he does run for president since I would prefer two good options next election rather than having to pick between two bad ones.  Well, this is ofcourse also hoping the Democrats can find someone good.
Yeah, they thought the constitution was worth FIGHTING and dying for. I don't think there is a "remote" possibility that some mad man with a bomb is going to blow people up.  It is highly probable that it will happen without precautions as suggested by the 9/11 commission.  What gets me about you guys is that you are willing to remove every firearm from ordinary citizens homes for the sake of protection.  Its a real contradiction.
They *are* hard. You can argue that the parameter being measured is a bad proxy for what we want to measure, but then again, any synthetic indicator would have flaws. Some solve it by sticking to the price of a single product (eg The Economist and its BigMac index) or by trying to modify the definition of the parameter over time. Problem with the second approach is, your political opponents will always accuse you of "gerrymandering" the stats. So stick with what you have -- or else tread very lightly, and only after having gathered some consensus.
An *incident*!?! &lt;/sulu&gt;
&gt; Even after watching this video there will be useful idiots in the West saying the problem is not with Islam but with America, Britain, and Israel. You are the only [useful idiot](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Useful_Idiot) in this thread. &gt; The expression "useful idiot" has never been discovered in any published document of Lenin's, nor has anyone claimed to have heard him say it. ----- &gt; People who are filled with such self-loathing are pitiful creatures indeed. Perhaps not all people consider themselves one with spineless degenerates like you.  Then, it is not so much self-loathing, but rather basic human morality.
Although I don't support Israels attack on Lebanon, I don't see an all powerful Illuminati controlling this game in the background.  Humans don't live long enough for this plan to be feasible since it would take great care and exact planning spanning several generations of Illuminati members to make it happen.
I can see you and coldwarrior are going to be the best of pals.  A match among paranoid idiots made in heaven.
well said.
Depends on what you mean.  I've done ecstacy 4 times.  Each time at a rave.  No I'm not a raver, I've just been with a friend a few times.  Hammy may be right about it being cut with something else.  All I remember is an intense hell that felt like a freight train wrecking through the fragile parts of my brain.  I'm only citing my own experience, but its almost impossible to OD on lsd, where overdosing on amphetimines is very easy.
Compared to nursing, engineering, and some other professional fields, it is relatively easy to gain the credentials necessary to become a teacher. And as long as it is relatively easy to become a teacher, compensation will remain low.   I think that being a good teacher requires passion and creativity which are both very hard to measure with standardized tests. Too bad there isn't a way to easily separate great teachers from lousy ones, then pay the great ones much more money.   
Do you know what most fundamental Christians think should be done to homosexuals? Does it involve public execution?  What evidence do you have to support this claim?  There scores of documented evidence of this in Iran and throughout the Middle East. Would women under Mosaic Law be treated any better? Who is advocating for this law to be the majority law of the land the way that Iran is advocating that Sharia law be the law of the land from Iran to Spain? "But doing so would mark you a terrorist rather than a freedom fighter." Ok, so I'm confused.  So you do support Sharia law?  Those that are fighting to impose Sharia law are fighting to free us from the bonds of prosperity?  Well, I'm glad you at least admitted that you share their world view. Maybe you and your buddy David Duke can get a spot on Syrian state sponsored TV together. http://www.memritv.org/search.asp?ACT=S9&amp;P1=941 So do you support this freedom fighter? Btw - I think that your "freedom fighters" have been more responsible for the bloodshed of fellow Arabs and Persians just trying to live their lives than any foreign nation propping up a "puppet" government.
Batshit insane anti-semitism conspiracy theory nutball crap. You don't have to stoop to this shit, to believe that Israel has went overboard this time... I almost always side with them, but this is ridiculous.  They captured soldiers... they didn't kidnap civilians this time. You don't get to claim terrorism, when they only attack valid military targets.
HOW DID HE GET THIS RESEARCH WHERE CAN I FIND IT
title should be "Cocooned and coddled, kids today can't cope"
You better refine your programming skills. There are ways to make it fully auditable. Think of the billions of dollars tranfered every day using computers.  The problem with voting machines is that they are not open source, and only manufacturer knows what's going on.  Paper process is also not perfect. I've seen video of russian elections, when half of the votes were simply burned.
you forgot: they are reptiles, not humans!
It just means you've collapsed the wave function. :)
Have you ever read Osama Bin Laden's statements? http://www.ict.org.il/articles/fatwah.htm Please take note of the date. Here is a sample from the 2nd paragraph:  "First, for over seven years the United States has been occupying the lands of Islam in the holiest of places, the Arabian Peninsula, plundering its riches, dictating to its rulers, humiliating its people, terrorizing its neighbors, and turning its bases in the Peninsula into a spearhead through which to fight the neighboring Muslim peoples. If some people have formerly debated the fact of the occupation, all the people of the Peninsula have now acknowledged it. The best proof of this is the Americans' continuing aggression against the Iraqi people using the Peninsula as a staging post, even though all its rulers are against their territories being used to that end, still they are helpless. Second, despite the great devastation inflicted on the Iraqi people by the crusader-Zionist alliance, and despite the huge number of those killed, in excess of 1 million... despite all this, the Americans are once against trying to repeat the horrific massacres, as though they are not content with the protracted blockade imposed after the ferocious war or the fragmentation and devastation."  (Sounds alot like it came from the DU, DNC, BBC, NPR, or Moveon doesn't it?) I know that you probably agree with what he has to say - you probably even believe his methods are justified.   http://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Osama_bin_Laden%27s_Declaration_of_War Now, if this stuff were served on a plate for you - the same way that these stories of the Shadow Evangelical Army are force fed to you I think that your opinion would just be aligned with his cause.   Saying that I am yearning for war is innaccurate because I know that our enemies are pressed more to attack by an artificially created divide.  With one side taking up their cause and shaping their political justification for their acts.
I'm always amazed at the fact that people will tolerate the horrors of war, but then be offended at the word 'fuck.' 
I think that signatures are equivalent of a one-time pad. Sure, some people have pretty signatures that look stellar each and every time, but no one signature produced by the same person is identical (in theory). Mine is as ugly as signatures go. Because of that, I tend not to put much emphasis on being pretty and legible. As a result, most of my signatures don’t look the same, but still have a familiar style that I can recognize, if not by someone else. So in my opinion, signatures do not make good identifiers, in the case of having other people identifying and verifying your own signature.
Einstein rings, in astronomy, too...
You're right. And the payoff for alternative energy is too far down the road for business to invest in, unless there are substantial subsidies. I know the big liberal government failed miserably in the States but I do feel that government needs to be far sighted enough to lead in investment in areas that are not immediately profitable or maybe not profitable ever, but are just the right thing to do. For example, investing in research in disease that affects too small a number of people for big drug companies to turn a profit on. Or more to the point, funding research into alternative sources of energy. I think subsidy has it's place.
beware: annoying ads and pop ups on this site
I think someone should come up with a new word to define these cowards.  Something to the likes that inmates come up for those that seek "hostility neutral" prison sentences or fall victim to an "unsolicited penis in the anus" while doing their time in a supermax. Wait!  I have it.  These guys seek an obstacle free blade swing.  A more accomodating acceptance thought removal procedure.  Help me out here!
Space is a few degrees Kelvin. ...just a thought.
I see you failed both history and math.
More wheezy geezer rantings about "kids today!" I regret that I have but one downmod to give to this story. 
Personal favorite: Bose-Einstein Condensate.
Is this making a difference either?  From reading those replies it would appear not.  None of the responses there reflected any understanding of the point of the whole thing. They can't get past the seeing it as an insult to their religion.  I can't help but wonder if a more restrained approach would be more effective. 
interesting
gotta eat something ... and eating means death.
bet that new face cost a lot
People do this ... for free?
can't wait to see it
Those godless, communist heathen at the BBC WILL PAY!!!!!!
None of mine did. They ought to have.
Well, coming from an embedded development background, this kind of thing is pretty typical.  Hell, there's probably a JTAG interface on the board.  And only the very newest chips  have any protection on that. It goes back to this.  Anyone with physical access to the machine can do nearly anything they want.  It is all a matter of time and talent. Granted, flipping a switch is really lowering the bar as far as that all goes.
Related [funny story](http://bigpicture.typepad.com/writing/2005/01/credit_card_sig.html) about credit card receipt signatures.
My co-workers and I were joking today that Duke Nukem Forever will be written in Perl 6 and require Windows Vista to run... :)
http://reddit.com/goto?id=bsto
It is a rant about parents today.
That's my understanding as well.  Organic is more about the environmental impact.  Good organic food means it's managed sustainably and ethically.
"We're so concerned we're almost uh ... _almost_ kinda gonna think about resigning in protest. Maybe."
so if i take an apple from an apple tree, what dies?
humorous, but inaccurate. The blink tag in this context can, rather than imply two states of being, imply change according to time.    Schrödinger's cat either is or is not dead.  The cat does not live then die then live then die.   On the other hand, one could say that 13-year old girls are &lt;blink&gt;im&lt;/blink&gt;polite.
Username \tyosaphbridge@gmail.com  Password \tfirefly0
Don't worry, he'll be back in black...
Not when you have to pay an employee $100 an hour to put it together.
The odds of a launch mishap are too high.
I think this illustrates it's point very well. Though it may want to show a picture of Google's personal homepage, as that can get bulky too.
Depends on the density of tha radioactive material withinm the non-radioactive medium, no?
and?
I think this is probably the best essay I've ever read.  It was -1 last time I looked, though it's at 6 now. "The Singer Solution to World Poverty" http://reddit.com/goto?id=13958 
You can add back Wikipedia search pretty easily, at least.
5/3 bank is also absolutely terrible
I wonder if we can use this edict to retrospectively take back all the presents that have ever been given to people at Christmas who don't believe in the bible! That's a lot of present debt. I wonder if that means that the number of bogusly gifted Christmas presents given each year has also increased with global warming against the number of pirates out there?
[Insurance by the Mile, A Simple Way to Slow Global Warming](http://harpers.org/bb-insurance-by-the-mile-2838238.html)
What is my snake suffers from too much friction?
So how shady do people think this is?
Impressive. Also seems unlikely... building a 3d image from a collection of photographs is one thing when it is a square in papal Rome, but what about taking pictures randomly from the internet. The search space for image similiarities is going to be near infinite. 
This is the craziest shit I have ever seen. The Holocaust is part of a plot to create a Jewish homeland in "Palestine"?  Please pinch me, I must be dreaming.
So good for you i guess ?:)
yeah, that was convenient...
Yale. Obviously.
The punchline is that [Acts 2:38](http://skepticsannotatedbible.com/acts/2.html#38) is about being baptised. Why post that verse!? [In whose name is baptism to be performed?](http://skepticsannotatedbible.com/contra/baptism.html)
Six month Used Lund Boat for Sale co-operate head office 234 henry carr avenue victoria island  lagos, Nigeria.  hello.   my name is terry i live in the island part of lagos and i have my Six month Used Lund Boat which i want to sell,is a 2004 Lund Boat, 14 ft, 9.9 Evinrude motor, new water pump. Runs great, excellent condition. Yacht Club roller trailer. 4 seats. $700.00 .asking email me terrycarroll19792002@yahoo.com or call 234-80-320-523-89  Thank You and your urgent response is appreciated.  Terry Carroll. 
Oy.  This is just one of many implementations of Arc we've experimented with over the past 5 years.  Others have been built on top of Common Lisp. Honestly, guys, random emails I send to mailing lists are not worth posting to reddit.  Plus now I'll have to think about what I'm saying every time I send an email to a mailing list...
May His Noodleness cast His deadly tomato sauce upon you!
I disagree. It's clear the writer of this article doesn't like math and is not someone with a "theoretical" inclination. Here's why I disagree. He says "Experimentalists Favor Simplicity" while "Theorists Favor Sophistication". Nonesense. It is the theorists who strife for simplicity. They're always seeking "elegant" theortical basis.
He should fit right in with you guys. Honestly, what has he said that can't be found here 30 times a day.  Jews are responsible for all wars - thats like a big "Duh" for you guys.
besides, there are already many heretic bibles around (for example, the Jehova's witnesses' bible)
&gt; If you believe there is no difference between animals   &gt; and humans, then your logic is correct. A lot of vegetarianism debates circle back to the question of human superiority. Most of the time, the meat-eater is guilty of the Naturalistic Fallacy (i.e, because humans are stronger, smarter, or whatever else, we have the right to make use of creatures as we wish).  This is wrong. Google it.  But in general, I've found that this is actually just religion. Man is God of the Earth because I want Man to be God of the Earth. In practice, however, there is very little justification for arbitrarily declaring man superior to other creatures. In fact, if you believe so strongly in man's superiority, then certainly you also believe that man is *morally* superior to the four-legged among us and should exercise reasonable dietary discretion. &gt; Remeber to watch out for the ants you step on and the   &gt; bugs hitting your windshield! Are you suggesting that if it's not possible to eliminate *all* suffering then we shouldn't try to eliminate *any* suffering. That's kind of a weird worldview, IMHO.
Is it coincidence that these headlines sandwich this headline. http://www.ebeefs.com/beefs/2006/8/1/lebanon-must-resist-zionists-and-neocons.html
Yes.  Though seems that every plane I get on has an endless supply of golf magazines.
a
Sad stuff...something the powers that be can actually step up and fix.
Wow!  Did you come up with that all by yourself - man you lefty's are so quick witted. I love the liberal enclypedia. Panty's on the head, loud music, and being forced to stand in the same position = torture Starving your own population, ignoring international law, and making your population the playthings of your demented offspring = leader of a soverign nation.   
&gt; Once you're past the initial check point, they rarely if ever check your ID again at the gate. Last few times I flew I was asked for ID numerous times at most airports.  I was asked for photo ID when I handed my boarding pass to the usher (or whatever they're called) right at boarding time everywhere, I think.  Basically, 2 US and 1 German airport.  And the Munich airport was like some giant glass maze; I was asked for ID probably three times just to get to the waiting area by the gate.
This is funny, sure, but at the same time, mind-bending and strangely profound.
For what it's worth, mikepurvis, that article is a series of straw men. I've never heard a thoughtful vegetarian make most of those arguments (and he simplifies, distorts, or misunderstands the ones that are actually worthy of debate).
I love left's new documentary on Militant Islam better, "Militan Islam:  Can it succeed where communism failed?"
the rap video is almost disturbing.
Come on!  We all know those Israeli's planted that bomb and its a good thing that one of them found the heart not to kill those women and children on board as a way to frame those innocent people. /Please turn on your sarcasm meter.
From http://paulgraham.com/resay.html: Why didn't you say some of the things you can't say? The most extreme of the things you can't say would be very shocking to most readers. If you doubt that, imagine what people in 1830 would think of our default educated east coast beliefs about, say, premarital sex, homosexuality, or the literal truth of the Bible. We would seem depraved to them. So we should expect that someone who similarly violated our taboos would seem depraved to us.   ======================================================================= So comment on things that you think are true, that will shock others.  The purpose of this is to find out what shocking things are in  people's heads. IF SUCH THINGS OFFEND YOU, PLEASE MOVE ON. Thanks. 
Rumors, innuendo, and Fox News?
I have seen it printed in lots of places.
Dude, by your logic, over 50% of Americans would be bankrupt.  That is not the case.  Your whole argument is ridiculous.
Typical example of a lefty that doesn't know anything about the US military - except that he doesn't like it and he doesn't have to! There are more generals then there are used sperm in that crusty happy sock that these freshman polysci majors keep under their bunk.
I don't understand what the point is. Was there text to go along with this .gif? Yahoo is bulky, Google isn't. And..?
*This posting has been removed by the Craigslist community* I'm missing the joke.
Beside God is pro-abortion.  He don't even mind aborting already born babies.  Like all Egyptians first-borns for instance.
Yeah, it's like they're all looking at me, wanting to know what I've done with my life.
of course it does. but then again, so does *eating food*.
Care to advise reddit's users on what advice you can put forth to solve the Iraq problem or should we assume that 'righty' has all of the right answers? Stop with the partisan rhetoric, eh? It's not doing any of us any good.
rated all the way down to hell. i don't know why, it makes sense. i got on the wrong side of something, i guess. pffft, politics.
In the general case, how would you like to see this work?
Where is that?
The funniest part of that article refers to Honda as a "Top F1 team".
Ok Ok. I'm trying to be better about features.reddit starting now.
I just upgraded the search engine the other night. One new feature is the url: tag for searching urls. However, it also broke a few things I need to go back and clean up. Namely, I haven't figured out a good way to join the search results with the actual reddit db as they are no longer in the same db.
Ok. We've been talking about tagging for a while. I don't know when it's coming, but it's coming.
&gt; and? So it addresses the objection: "won't somebody please think of the plants!"
Much of the author's argument seems to focus on a common misquote.  As if that would change anyone's mind!  A witty saying proves nothing.  Err, that would be Voltaire.
It's not just parents and it's not just kids -- we're turning into a nation of pussies.  The weatherman can't wait to tell you with breathless excitement that the * hot weather * cold weather * stormy weather is going to kill you if you don't stay cowering in your home watching WeatherAlert8 or whatever. Jumpin' Jesus on a pogo stick.  It was pretty warm here (~95) this weekend.  And as I usually do, I took our younger daugther for a stroller ride around the neighborhood.  Three miles we went, did we see another soul outside?  Well, only if you count the neighbor's cat. *fixed spelling 
Ok, so I tried this and now I know why we didn't do it this way in the first place. When firefox users try to open in a new tab, this opens the link in a new tab and also in the current window. I'll revisit this problem again once I get through some other bugs. I know it's annoying.
Never.
.
This seems a valid theory.  I've bought one computer book in the past year: Programming Ruby.  But I have about a dozen perl books on my shelf, and I suspect I'll never buy another Ruby book or another Perl book.  I learned programming with perl and C (and a few others like JavaScript, Scheme, bash, C++, Java, in small doses), now I tend to just want a good tutorial and reference...everything else comes from the web anyway so I don't bother buying more books.
According to this chart Actionscript is on par with Python book sales.  I don't even know what Actionscript *is*, much less believe it is as popular as Python.  But maybe I'm not hanging around in the right crowds.  Reckon it's the same kind of people that use Visual Basic?  I don't know any of those people either.
I've always found this sort of stuff interesting - bucket or pail, duck duck goose or duck duck gray duck.  I was surprised to learn, as an undergraduate, that some people call a sudden storm a "cloudburst" - I'd never known there was a word for that.
I once pointed out to a biblical inerrantist that at one point in the Bible it says Jesse (father of King David) had eight sons, but in another place it lists all his sons by name, but there are only seven in the list.  He wiggled out of it by saying  * perhaps the list was written before the eighth son was born and then never updated  * the original manuscripts were inerrant, but the missing eighth son could be a copyist's error. At that point I stopped posting because it was pointless to continue.  I should have asked how he could be sure that other places didn't have really important copyists' errors that could result in him going to hell, but I didn't think of it until later. (You won't find this exchange on the net; it was on a now-defunct BBS.)
I'm not the one doing it.  Surely if you are doing it, it is because it is good for you. Self-hatred, perhaps?
"Computer guys have skilled fingers if you know what I mean " As lame as this sounds, there's some truth to that. When you can type 100+ WPM you can certainly rotate your finger in a manner that'll get even the most stubborn girls asking for more. Just sayin'!
I hope Javert didn't see him.
IT'S KINDA SAD...BUT WHAT'S THE BIG DEAL?? PPL ACT LIKE THEY'VE NEVER SEEN A CELEBRITY GO INTO REHAB..IDK!
ok
&gt;I should have asked how he could be sure that other places didn't have really important copyists' errors that could result in him going to hell, but I didn't think of it until later. "God wouldn't let that happen." You can't argue with those people. Two things than CAN work: talk about evolution, and talk about evidence of God's action in the world as of today.
I know it's spazzy. I'll go back to it soon and get it right once and for all.
damn this sucks.. badly!
You said; Massive investment in developing responsible energy sources and conservation: yes. And in the meantime........  What's great about that hypothetical is that you don't have to practice it - just "care" about it and that separates you from smokestacks.  You yourself, by your communication on a computer, have demonstrated your demand for power other than to provide for basic needs.  You said:  no. sensible, holistic, competent, transparent policy. As in?  Wait, I get it now.....its like that solves everything.  All I had to do was imagine myself being a college drop out with 50K in student loans and it made perfect sense.   You said:  no. accept the uncomfortable reality that current and previous policies are creating more terrorists than they eliminate:  You're right! Yes, because Islamic fundamentalism is driven by reciprocity.  Its so clear now!  Its like a quote from Ward Churchill, "If my Grandfather saw me doing something unthwart on someone - he would give me the same kind of treatment and asked how I liked it.  Then ask me if I understand."  Of course if I were saying this out loud I would be speaking in a monotonous tone as though I had some type of wisdom inherent in my 1/16 Native American blood.  Of course I would then contradict myself by droning on about how there aren't any black and white's and throw in a blah blah Bush for effect. You said:  but again, in today's political climate, it's hard for moderates to be heard above the noise. There are no moderates, there are only those on the right that get bullied into conceding to the left.  That's why John McCain is called a "Maverick" and Joe Lieberman is called a liability.  
&gt; Your logic doesn't apply to turkeys. Have you ever spent a significant amount of time around a turkey?  Yes, plenty!  Did a male turkey bite you or something?  Females are friendly and will cuddle and like to be pet on the head.  I have also seen smart sheep; Josh the sheep figured out how to open the latch on the barn with his mouth so he could steal the pigs' food while they were sleeping (at an animal sanctuary where I volunteered).  One guy who saw that was totally floored, having always been told that sheep are stupid.  This sheep was around all sorts of other animals, though, so he interacted with goats, pigs, chickens, horses, etc. and wasn't just grazing around other sheep.  The more stimulation a mind gets, the smarter it will seem, whether sheep, dog, human, monkey, etc.  As for the male turkey, once I saw him jump-kick a goat when he was peeved.  He had gotten stuck in the fence and when he got un-stuck he was either embarrassed (some people won't grant that to turkeys) or otherwise upset :) 
&gt;You are right about the videotaping. But that is not what my argument was about. I simply stated that it is easy to stop an electronic system from trying all combinations in a speedy fashion. In the context of computer security, the delay idea doesn't work because of possible DOS attacks. But in this context you are absolutely right.
Actually it sounds more like a rant about Jewish mothers across the ages
First 45 Customers who check in get A, 46-90 get B, 91-122 or 137 get C.
&gt;Plus now I'll have to think about what I'm saying every time I send an email to a mailing list... That's the downside of being a star :) Heck, I'm gonna start a geekarazzi magazine! In the first issue: * "Amazing pics of pg on the beach!"  * "Spez talks about his sex life!"  * "LoveTest: are you a haskell or lisp kind of lover?"
there will still be a backdoor! that was the point of this article.
&gt; Yeah, they thought the constitution was worth FIGHTING and dying for. How is that a response to what I said?  You're not advocating fighting, you're advocating giving up. &gt; What gets me about you guys is that you are willing to remove every firearm from ordinary citizens homes for the sake of protection. Its a real contradiction. The contradiction is that you are willing to give up a freedom at least as important as the right to bear arms for a little extra protection from something that has resulted in far fewer deaths than guns.  The goal of terrorists is to scare people beyond their actual ability to do harm, and it looks very much like they've succeeded.  
Oh, they exist. Here is where some of the overachieving parents &amp; their worried offspring hang out: http://talk.collegeconfidential.com/forumdisplay.php?f=4
Then why not the magic key as they are doing and the lock as the "emergency" solution ?  Everybody should have their own combinations and the lock should be shuffled a few seconds after the right combination was entered.
no, I offered a clear explination on how he could improve the article, just as I suggested he do towards dell.
Where did you take your history classes ? :) Hizzbalaa-R-US ?   
&gt; ...and I'm not a woman. I am ... but only when I listen to Goodbye Horses. 
The kid is 18. He can do whatever he wants without his father "letting" him do it.
BS. Companies have leases, service contracts and 500 other reasons that they can't just switch vendors hourly.
&gt; Typical example of a lefty that doesn't know anything about the US military - except that he doesn't like it and he doesn't have to! Ummm... Chuck Hagel is a Republican Senator serving on Intelligence and Foreign Relations committees, a decorated Vietnam War veteran, and has repeatedly spoken out about placing the realities of national security above partisan politics.  Amazing what qualifies as a "lefty" these days, huh?
i dont think he has much to say that would be so far shocking that it would seem depraved, even despite the fact that it were true. the whole point is merely to suggest that such topics exist, but i doubt he could come up with more than two.  listen, if he could come up with one good one (and could show it was true), he would have written a book about it already and made some money. nothing is so taboo that you cant write about it in america.
I've known a few people that fit the descriptions in the article nearly exactly. Are "real people" like the people in sitcoms?  I suspect so -- people model themselves after the behavior of the people they're exposed to -- despite not knowing anyone like that.
[I have the answer!](http://reddit.com/info/btio/comments) (Warning: gratuitous, but needed, karma-jacking)
That was beautiful.
Real people *are* like that. Just take a look at suburban parents in somewhat wealthy areas. Columbia, MD (lived there until earlier this year) is full of parents like the ones described in the article. They have a bunch of screwed up kids.
Well, they could disband the NBA for a year and come back as the NBBA or something :)
Unless you count eating severely over-populated whitetail deer (that you killed with a homemade longbow).
Me too, this was a good read. A thank you to the poster. :]
Why don't they just sell precooked eggs?
&gt;Honestly, guys, random emails I send to mailing lists are not worth posting to reddit. Normally, I'd agree with you, but this one isn't so random. I think this was worth posting to reddit because it confirms that you're still actively working on Arc. Some people [believe](http://www.google.com/search?num=100&amp;hs=wpQ&amp;hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;safe=off&amp;client=firefox&amp;rls=org.mozilla%3Aen-US%3Aunofficial&amp;q=arc+lisp+vaporware&amp;btnG=Search) you're not.
Inefficiency ?  Then how come we (in Canada) with a purely pencil and paper system get our results much, much faster than the US ? I think the official explanation is that the system is standardized and works the same way accross the country.
No it doesn't. We need to eat more of these animals that are eating the lovely plants. That way they will stop eating the plants. How is it that fewer plants are eaten when we stop eating animals? There would then be more animals to eat plants.
For starters, an article making the presumption that three 4 star Generals amounts to some serious concerns is partisan trickery. As for the Iraq problem - Yes I do have answers.  Let our army do what it is designed to rather than operate on some self imposed limit that our enemies use to their advantage.  That is the biggest problem I have had with the management of this war.  Here are my rules: 1.  No military protected media personnel.  If you go you go at your own risk to cover the war and if you get too close to a battle and lose your life you took that risk with that knowledge.  War is ugly and your enemies and the media will use it to their advantage. 2.  Drop all Clerics that incite people to take up arms at the closest border of their chosing.  If they have aspirations of influence and dominance they can take it to a European country where it will be well received and accomodated. 3.  Turn over captured bombers and bomb makers to the local citizens and villages that were victims of their crimes.  Make their trials public and let those people determine their punishment. 4.  Seal the borders for all except those that wish to flee.  Make Iraq an AIR/SEA only destination.  5.  Plant dud rounds and faulty explosives throughout the country and let Darwin do the hard work. Its a modern day tragedy that we have to jeopardize the safety of our own military forces to accomodate the demands of European guilt over colonialism.  Setting restrictions on how we fight while legitimizing the tactics of our enemy as reciprocal have given them a blank check on how they operate while tying our hands in fighting and defending ourselves from them.  Treating their near accidents that kill our troops in the two's and three's as major victories while portraying our youth as wreckless bloodthristy hounds is innaccurate and strenghtens their will.  If these people that use our soldier's deaths were really concerned about their lives they would be demanding more bullets and beans and not more body armor.
Could this be the end to the fighting?
Haven't seen them. 
I guess its because those who liked it could not break the addiction to come back and mod it up.
I'm sure that he would qualify for what you call a moderate - a Republican that cares about what the media writes about him. I thought that whole "I served in Vietnam" thing went down the drain with John Kerry?  If you really cared about what veterans think you would care to listen to what those serving in Iraq have to say - but instead you accuse them having a bloodlust.
Even the FSM is nowhere near as funny as Jesus. You just have to read the [right gospels](http://www.gospels.net/translations/infancythomastranslation.html)
Living in Pa., this is one fun thing to tell you which side of the state someone is from.  The state is divided almost right down the middle.
Check out the cameo appearance of the Flying Spaghetti Monster in [this video.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fjVtJzTSuPw) 
this guy's [p-p-p-powerbook](http://www.p-p-p-powerbook.com) scam is entertaning too.
First, the goal of terrorism isn't to scare people into not doing harm.  The goal is concession or more appropriately submission.  To kill enough people and disrupt their lives to a point of surrendering to your demands. What rights have you lost?  What freedom am I advocating that I give up?  I've given up the ability to travel to another country relatively free of fear - isn't that a human right?  I will not give up my right to prosperity or happiness - which happens to be a stated target of militant Islam, not to mention a lot of Americans.
fuck that, this is the only truth there is. israelis are taught to hate and to murder from this young of age. ill tell you guys, ive seen pics from the halacaust, japanese war, vietnam war, i have never seen shit this fucked up. i never saw little kids (and girls even!) joining in. i could puke from disgust. taken out of context? are you a fucking moron or are you pissed that now, finally, people see things for what they are? oh yeah, no these girls were drawing on uh i dont know toy rockets right, they had no clue. and isnt that skank in the background their mom? yeah, cheering them on. fuck that, as a jew, i find this disgusting and if those were my kids, fuck. this is the kind of thing that gives us a bad name, like we're all like this. we're not, im not, anyone who would support this has no soul, no heart, and no fear of god.
He said he wants to see Mario's pipesnake...
Really?  How many of reddit users are boomerang kids?  Kids that moved back home after college?  How many of those boomerang kids have fathers that speak in an NPR gender neutral, slightly effiminate tone? I prefer the English term for boomerang kids, KIPPERS.  Kids in Parents Pockets eating retirement savings.
It astonishes me how much was accomplished in the 60's and 70's in terms of space exploration.  To me the bigger story is  the voyager probes visiting and photographing all of the gas giants and then heading out of the solar system essentially before the personal computer came about. I can see not going back to the moon as it's a boring place to play golf.  I'd love to see Mars, though.
[Recursion redefined](http://reddit.com/info/b6aq/comments) a little before the digg recursion caused the stack overflow.
I wonder what the "Other" responses are, particularly in the counties where these oddballs garner the majority of the vote.
"A British teenager tore out an eldery woman's heart after stabbing her and drank her blood." 
That would be quite a different story. Woody Allen notwithstanding, most of their offspring end up quite well.
From what I understand the Hezboh's put that rocket near that building and it took 8 hours for the building to fall.  That means that for 8 hours those people had to stay in that building. If there is one thing that these guys love more than a dead Israeli its one of their own to prop up in a photo.
nm, found the answer to my own question. The "other" responses are all listed at http://www.popvssoda.com/stats/TOTAL.html. The top vote-getters: soft drink, tonic, soda pop, drink, and Tarzan Slam (?)
Or offended by [women breastfeeding their babies](http://www.cnn.com/2006/US/07/27/nursing.cover.ap/index.html). 
sodie?  sodapop?
Denial of service?  The person is already in my car!  If I am in the vincinity, then someone's going to get his ass kicked.   Probably mine.  :-)  Maybe I'll call the police then.
Once you know the facts, reading what Israelis have to say is like having stepped through the looking glass into wonderland. Most things are there (though certainly not Israel's leaders being unelected or undemocratic, let alone fascist or racist) but twisted beyond recognition. Reading things through such a giant prism of self-deception gets annoying really fast.
Is there any data that would convince you that you are wrong like statments, re-enlistment rates, and stories from soldiers that are serving and haved served in Iraq - yet they seem strangely absent in the media - unless they disagree then you can't escape them. We have to resurrect Vietnam veterans for the media glory days of Vietnam as experts on this current conflict. I'm sure Hagel quoted them correctly - just as I'm sure he probably ignored the tens of dozens of other 4 star Generals involved in the conflict.  
&gt;But I'm surprised nobody's done so. A lot of people already have taken ideas from PG's Arc posts and used them elsewhere. Somebody created a big stir on CLL a while back by claiming to have implemented his own Arc (he hadn't - he just wrote a few macros for CL to add some features PG talked about). What's more common is for people to borrow features for their own personal utility libraries. Here's one that eliminates a bunch of parens: Arc's one-var let for CL.  (defmacro let1 (var val &amp;body body)  `(let ((,var ,val))    ,@body))
For those who missed it, Stephen Colbert pretended to edit the "Elephant" article on his show tonight, claiming that their numbers had tripled over the last ten years. He encouraged his viewers to do the same.
I love how they gave the kid riding the bike two citations too, because obviously getting dragged 30 feet by a car wasn't enough to teach him a lesson or anything. Now, if it had been an old man on the bike and a young kid in the car, you can bet the driver would have gotten more than a "driving on a suspended license" ticket.
Ha.  I actually voted that up.  I live on the East coast, so it doesn't affect me at all, but it was a very interesting article.  And now I see what HBO's show "Big Love" is based on.  Fascinating.
The voter should be able to see, but not touch, the paper copy. When voters can take the ballot, they can be expected by their employers to produce it; showing that they supported their employers' preferred candidates. You'd be effectively doing away with the secret ballot.
really?
Hand-marked ballots are smudgable and the like. you need it prited by a computer. Once you've gone that far, you get a lot of benefit for not much cost to have the votes counted rapidly and automatically by the computer.
&gt; I'ts sad so many people believe in this ridiculous religion. As if the author of FSM actually believes that the flying spaghetti monster exists. That's hilarious.
Yeah... I'm in an ivory tower alright...  20 years of industry experience (I only started teaching at a University 3 years ago).  The reason I was hired was to bring real-world experience to SE courses.   While the majority of code out there just plain sucks, good design and well implemented code does exist.  And the situation you describe isn't premature optimization... it's  incompetence.
Becuase then you could compare receipts and deduce who recent voters voted for.
Thanks for giving the secret away.  Now every moron will be in the A line... As a side note, it is much easier to just check in exactly 24 hours before your flight -- they you are certain to get an A pass.
what if they dissolved the four teams and then reformed?
'You should not accept my teachings on hearsay unless and until you understand it from your own point of view' - Buddha
Amazing comment from a religious group. Quote: "All of the discussions on Christian morality are weakening the spirit of the army and the nation and are costing us in the blood of our soldiers and civilians".
Why?  These guys made a great deal -- why should they be punished for that?
&gt; I don't even know what Actionscript is, much less believe it is as popular as Python Then google it, asshole. It's the scripting language for this obscure platform named "Flash".
Apparently your powers of comprehension are insufficient to the task of understanding me. By what chain of reasoning do you conclude that "by [my] logic, over 50% of Americans would be bankrupt"?
&gt;Messing up, however, even in the playground, is wildly out of style. Although error and experimentation are the true mothers of success, parents are taking pains to remove failure from the equation. Yay, sustainable competetive advantage for me.
a wheel lock or even the club will deter most thieves.  those that really want you car will tow it.
Those of us who celebrate the winter solstice will still get our presents, just as we have since long before the monotheists came and tried to join us on our holiday :-)
Now /THAT/ was fascinating. Loved it. I can forgive the typo. Too many people are grumps here just to be grumps, not taking things in and thinking about them. 
Really. What asshole cops.
"Anyway, I'm *happy* with this book, because it's the first example of applying arithmetic to science. I'm a *bit* unhappy when I read about the stars' temperatures, but I'm not very unhappy because it's more or less right -- it's just an example of error. Then comes the list of problems. It says, 'John and his father go out to look at the stars. John sees two blue stars and a red star. His father sees a green star, a violet star, and two yellow stars. What is the total temperature of the stars seen by John and his father?' -- and I would explode in horror... There's no purpose whatsoever in adding the temperature of two stars. Nobody ever does that except, maybe, to then take the average temperature of the stars, but not to find out the total temperature of all the stars! It was awful!" **-Richard Feynman**
Yay for the little guys who spend more money on R&amp;D than on advertising and marketing!
The War Nerd is a 'warhead', a violent criminal. Someone who thinks that might makes right and that violence does indeed solve all problems. Now the thing is, he's fairly well-read on history and he certainly knows the history of military genocide. And he's made it more than obvious that he sees genocide as a perfectly acceptable solution to an intractable guerilla force. In fact, genocide is not the only military solution to a guerilla army. One prominent Israeli military historian advocates, more or less, infiltrating the populace and using guerilla warfare in return. This is the solution where you have to respect the population and avoid killing them at all costs. The War Nerd makes no mention of this solution ... **EVER**. He considers genocide to be a perfectly acceptable solution and never mentions anything that would reduce the level of violence involved. No mention of *anything* that would reduce the level of violence below a *genocide*. No, nevermind, it's obvious the War Nerd is *not* a Nazi. Other things that are equally as obvious as the War Nerd not being a Nazi: 1. Israel being democratic instead of having an unelected fascist regime  2. the IDF not being the second coming of the Schutz Staffel  3. Israel having a "right to exist" And you can even add my being completely deranged for thinking that landing a 20 megaton nuclear bomb in Jerusalem would be a good idea right about now. Of course, one key difference between the War Nerd and I is that I keep my fantasy life strictly separated from reality.
I am modding down as the link is not accessible for mortals with no coffin in nyties database
It's good to see so many people expressing that they care what happens to these cows.  If you want to learn about where your burgers come from, here are some photos:  http://www.factoryfarming.com/gallery/photos_beef.htm 
;-) 5 apple trees that were in the apple? Sorry, I couldn't resist...
Second Life is a fun virtual world that becomes unfun when trying to play in Linux due to lack of sound. The easiest fix for this is running the game as a windows program in linux via the emulator wine. Not as difficult as it sounds this how-I-didit shows the simple step by step process of running a windows game in linux. (or how to delete your emails in five simple steps)
good summary by Heading Out of The Oil Drum of this really important story.
Apparently I didn't make it sufficiently clear that I was being sarcastic when I said "No, nevermind, it's obvious the War Nerd is not a Nazi." One doesn't have to be a National Socialist or a Hitler sympathizer to be a Nazi. Mao hated Josef Stalin but both of them were Communists. And I can give you a long list of communists who weren't Soviet Communist party sympathizers. The War Nerd is a Nazi. In his heart of hearts, he approves of the Holocaust. Note that I am in no way being careless about these terms. Contrary to what you believe, I am being very, very specific. So for example, Robert Heinlein is clearly *not* a Nazi although he was indeed a Fascist. And also, Tom Clancy is clearly *not* a Fascist, although he is indeed a *Militarist*. In contrast, the War Nerd is a Militarist, a Fascist *and* a Nazi. Or put more succinctly, he's a Nazi. The historian I was referring to is, I think, Martin van Creveld.
THIS ONE! i just downmodded you
"rticles are anti-Bush and anti-Ann-Coulter and pro-gay-marriage and pro-choice I may agree with these articles, but I want to hear the other side of the story" do you also want to hear the merits of intelligent design and scientology?
Many places do.  However, that only works if you want to purchase cold, hard-boiled eggs.  Lots of folks (myself included) find that soft-boiled eggs are tastier, and those don't really keep in a fridge.
dude bread costs like a dollar. who the fuck wants to make bread?
industrial porn, yeah baby, show me your load balancer.
I always thought of the 'war nerd' as putting on an act.  He's obviously something of a misanthropist so he kind of pretends he doesn't mind slaughtering people.  But the few articles of his that I have read always left me with the impression that he actually believes its not reasonably winnable and would pull out the troops. I could be wrong though, maybe I haven't read enough war nerd yet.
I take it that faithful Catholics also recognize that failure to implant a fertilized zygote must then be murder? And as for monozygotic twins (or triplets, etc.) -- half a life?  a third of a life each?  What's it going to be? There are some rather starkly apparent contradictions wrapped within your smug morality.  You'd do well to examine them. 
writer shares his experience during his maiden flight in a Glider and wants to do it again!
The guys deserve it, if the NBA was dumb enough not to foresee the team's demise. 
They can touch it, just not keep it.  And yes, you're right as to why.
These people need therapy and anger managment.
Hat Tip TAPPED's Adele M. Stan. http://www.prospect.org/weblog/2006/07/post_985.html
Kinda neat, but it's not really 'infinity' (in the sense of mirrors facing each other, for instance), it's more an optical illusion..the picture frame leads into the 'past' and the 'future', if you will, instead of what I would consider a 'better infinity', being a man holding a picture of himself holding the same picture.  Minor quibble, I suppose, and 'infinity' certainly makes for a more likely upvote (which I'm still going to give, by the way) than 'optical illusion of infinity' or something.  Blah.  I'm rambling...
Poorly written with a side of bad grammar and very little actual insight.
Exactly.  Gaming machines in Las Vegas are reliable, because if they're not their owners lose money.  No one gives a shit about voting machines, though.  For example, [two brothers controled the companies whose machines counted 80% of the votes in 2004](http://www.onlinejournal.com/evoting/042804Landes/042804landes.html). People just don't seem to care.
Worst of all, this is not mere negligence on the part of the designers. This appears to be a deliberate effort to enable insiders to tamper with the vote. Everyone connected with Diebold should be indicted for conspiracy to commit voting fraud! Harvey
I'm saying, basically, that if LSD was our culture's prefered drug, rather than alcohol, damages would be far, far worse.  But that would be hard to imagine. Even in the drug culture, LSD was mostly supplanted by relatively less harmful drugs. Ironic, really, because LSD is one of the few drugs that "work" with no need for expectations and cultural context on the part of the drug user.
Ruby. It combines aspects of functional languages like Lisp with the pragmaticism of declarative languages. Python is much more boring from a theoretic perspective.
Funny, I always thought of circles as a sort of fat point.
You're right. It would conflict with the political agenda of the mass education system. Including but not limited to, indoctrinating obedience to authority, killing autonomy, killing creativity, killing initiative, killing joy of learning, and in poor (read black) neighbourhoods, instilling Fascism. Children's education is a solved problem. The solution is just rarely applied. If Engineering were similarly non-applied, the only safe bridges in North America would be in a dozen or so white neighbourhoods where the residents had had enough and practiced Do It Yourself.
&gt; Plant dud rounds and faulty explosives throughout the country and let Darwin do the hard work. That is the dumbest thing I've heard in a LONG time.  Likely it will kill or maim many children, as well.   
A planet destroying, nip down to the shops, tarmac only driven, too much fuel war creator, one man ego, there is a always a way around an over engineered technological unstealable SUV.  Any criminal who wants to take one is a fool. Read it a couple of times to get the flow, you know what I mean.....
So it is a series of tubes after all!
"a moral philosophy does not have to presuppose its own correctness for all instances." Yes, I believe it has, I have trouble imagining one that doesn't. Could you give an example? The point is that the survival of the species is not even considered the highest value in most ethics systems. If such an ethical system was followed, and the species died out, it would not prove anything about the correctness of the ethical system either way.
There is a picture of this stuff at http://escapeblog.com/europe/wake-up-and-smell-the-cheese/
Well... i really don't care. Whenever I have such a stupid commercial form, it only takes a minute to fill out, I enter random stuff for everything...... wonder what value this can have for them :)
Anti-Semitism has nothing to do with Zionism. Did you know that "Semite" means "ethnic Arab" and that anti-Semite means anti-Arab. And that Israel is composed of 90% Ashkenazi (sortof Southern Russian 10th century ethnic group) Jews whose ancestors never set foot in the Middle East? Did you know that Israel is the biggest openly racist state in the Western world? That it is in fact anti-Semitic? Did you know that quite a few of the founders of Israel had ties to (proposed a working alliance against Britain) Hitler's Nazi Party?
I did some experimenting, and it looks like Reddit tracks your IP. So the most a bot can do is downvote everything, or upvote everything, but it can't log in and log out with different user names in hopes of upmodding an item infinitely.
yes
I made the mistake of ^ modding a post I had submitted and reddit slammed me for it by converting my ^ mod into a down mod.  I did it again just to see if I was right and I was double slammed with two down mods that time.  I'm not sure exactly how that works, but there are some smarts built into reddit to make cheating inconvenient.
although you can comment infinitely.
yes this is the only cheat that works ...
Who was filming the 'tourists'? Was the 'second cameraman' the same both times? How could that have added to suspicion?  How much time passed between the two 'tourists'?  Who went first?  What is average response time to suspicious behavior from the guards in the area?  How heavy was tourism at the time(s) and date(s) of the runs? Mildly humorous, but far too incomprehensive to have any meaning.
comment spam -__- aiite. i'm done.
&gt; How else would all those jewish men get hard ons tonight. [INTERNS!!!](http://reddit.com/info/bphz/comments)
maybe one other way is to use proxies and a giant cluster or hack some distributed program like SETI or something, but proxies are too hard to find.
an impressive startup with ground-breaking technology in security audit area
DHoles hot news reader on a simple layout. digg, zdnet news. useful for PDA.
Yes thank you for that point. Well , see the problem is the modarate Muslims or lets call the Muslims do condemn those acts and work hard for them not to happen, but first of all if  they stand up for example and cry to stop these acts and so, they might be endangered of having a struggle or maybe a war with these exremists for not supporting them. second of all i dont think that the western media is helping either , because any condemning to an act by Muslims or whatever, doesnt reach the Wesern world in act of media. And so that you know , that many programs have been held do verify the true picture of islam and to condemn those awful acts of terrorists. And you should know or maybe you do, when the city of Amman in Jordan was attacked by terrorists too,probably because Jordan as we said before stood against these extremists. SO i agree about that but its hard to perpetrate.
Not true.  IP changes when a modem account is used every time you reconnect.  To compensate for changing IP, Reddit may use tracking cookies but bots are not browsers, they don't have to send cookies. So the bots still win.
NOOOOO!  *Really?* "U.S. Carbonated Beverage Manufacturers profit from McDonald's in warring nations!" *GASP!* "U.S. Oil Companies profit from automobile tire sales in warring nations!" *SHOCK!* "U.S. CPU Manufacturers benefit from electronic devices ranging from fighter jets to calculators sold in warring nations!" *ALARM!* It's a global economy.  Get over it. **Edit:** "Blizzard profits from MMORPGs, which some psychologists have linked to an increase in violent behavior AND have linked to being more popular with already violent-by-nature individuals resulting in a vicious cycle of violence and soaring software sales, in warring countries." I could do this all day...
I think that if I were stranded on Sardinia with no hope of rescue and was offered this by a shepherd, I would eat the shepherd.
&gt; No, you were clear. I meant that you weren't claiming he was a National Socialist, and that you were attempting to smear him by association with Hitler. Smear? Are you FUCKING INSANE? &gt; Yes, you do. Nazi is just an abbreviation for National Socialist. That's only the etymology of the word, not its meaning. It's quite evident that communicating with you in anything remotely resembling human language is impossible. You said it yourself, "You can be a bad person, and you can commit genocide, without being a Nazi." Here's a clue: neither the Soviet Union nor China at their most evil ever committed genocide. Wait, I suppose you're right after all. The Americans sure as hell committed genocide. The acid test is whether or not the War Nerd believes in Fascism. That is, whether he is a racist and anti-communist who believes society should be structured top-down strictly along military lines. Unfortunately we have no information one way or another on that but I'm going to go with 'yeah'.
I'd say Ruby.  I already know Python.
The bloody council should do something ... feels like such a typically UK bureaucratic cock-up ...
i say neither, learn a real language like java.
Huh, actually never even heard of them. No, I'm a fan of Montessori, Sudbury Valley, the other SunnyHill? and all the assorted anarchist schools stretching back to before the turn of the 20th century. Anything special to recommend A S Neil and Reich?
Unfortunately the French lab and WADA have proved themselves to not be credible sources after the recent situation with Lance Armstrong.  Read the UCI report: http://www.velonews.com/news/fea/9932.0.html &gt;A 132-page report recommended convening a tribunal to discuss possible legal and ethical violations by the World Anti-Doping Agency and to consider "appropriate sanctions to remedy the violations." &gt;The report said WADA and the LNDD may have "behaved in ways that are completely inconsistent with the rules and regulations of international anti-doping control testing," and may also have been against the law. It has already been established in other cases that their test for exogenous EPO returns false positives.  Even if they didn't violate chain-of-custody and other rules in this particular instance, their tests are far from infallible.  In either case, the UCI brought up serious questions of misconduct with WADA and the French national lab, so no weight should be given to their findings until they are investigated by a third party, audited, and cleaned up.   
I really enjoy watching a lot of the channels you can find on this site.
I also like www.channelking.com
*In the beginning the Universe was created. This has made a lot of people very angry and been widely regarded as a bad move.* -- Douglas Adams, _The Restaurant at the End of the Universe_
Agreed. Dilbert-style bosses learn slow.  But Google clearly has an advantage of not just being in the next paradigm but doing it really well, that has to compound rather quickly. Does Google's advantage kill Sun, Microsoft, and friend's tomorrow morning? No. But I'm going to bet probably much faster than Microsoft killed IBM in the 80's, of course they were resurrected in the nineties, as Microsoft started to reach the limits of how fast it could scale. I think there is an analogy here about Google vs the rest of the industry, and 3rd and 4th generation warfare. See the recent reddit of William Gibson. reddit citation: http://reddit.com/info/bogg/comments Actual link: http://www.williamgibsonbooks.com/blog/2006_07_01_archive.asp#115421005113754231 
because life beings at pollination!
Nobody even remembers Joshua. Hell, I don't even know what Joshua did and there's only a couple genocides in your list I don't recognize. Who the hell were the Bantu? And who did the Turks try to kill off? Oh wait, you're talking about the Kurds. I thought it was a more historical reference. Unfortunately, modern people try really hard to avoid any knowledge of genocides. Btw, yes I do have a soft spot for nutballs. It's actually interesting talking to you even though you ground my righteous indignation to a screeching halt.
I also recommand www.channelking.com
I use www.channelking.com
that's not too scalable, i can't really do it on my wireless network in college w/o restarting my computer
a better feed is at www.channelking.com under Poker TV Network
Video link:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JgKUnhCANTY
it gives us some unique features, such as network bridging audit of SSH (Secure SHell), Windows Remote Desktop, VNC, Oracle, Sybase MSSQL, etc.
No, no, no. This is true for scientific theories, but not for what we can call framework for thought. Science itself (but not predictions made by it) is a framework for thought, as are all philosophies and religion, and also some pesudosciences such as freudianism, marxism and even the old elemental theories of the greeks.  These frameworks can be evaluated as to whether they are useful in certain regards, but that does not mean that they are incorrect.   The shakers probably don't place much value on the survival of the species. They certainly place other things more highly. Although I firmly believe that this priority is either right or wrong (I am not a postmodernist), I do not believe there is an objective way of showing it. That would require another framework of thought, a framework for evaluating frameworks so to say, and this again would be no good in evaluating itself.
I like www.channelking.com better, bigger screen and easier to navigate
Well, _suggests_(that he's still actively working on Arc) perhaps, not confirms. It could all be a sneaky ploy to confuse the vapourware accusers :).
See my citation billmon post about this Rush comment. http://reddit.com/info/btzz/comments
www.ChannelKing.com is a better site with more content
Modems as in phone modems.  You know, the thing that was still the only choice for net access like 6 years ago. With modems you just issue Hayes commands like ATDT, ATH etc; no reboot needed.
...and that makes me a saaad panda.
Religions are all-encompassing world views. They have universal scope, so to say. How can you test a world view?  Either by another world view, which may not be very interesting (I'm sure my world view would be seen as ridiculous by those with world views I disagree, such as collectivists and anti-egalitarians, but so what?), or by itself, which can only show internal consistency, not correctness. I'm quite sure the Shaker's world view is internally consistent.  It's not ridiculous to them, in other words.
&gt; How is it that fewer plants are eaten when we stop eating animals? There would then be more animals to eat plants. Because we breed them and then feed them 80% of the grain produced in the country (U.S.).  Feedlots are used because a grazing cow needs something like 9 acres of land if eating grass, in order not to overgraze. 
A faster site is www.channelking.com
I also enjoy www.channelking.com
Since PG is taking an axiomatic approach, using Arc to define all of Arc execept a very few fundamental operators, it's not such a big deal to port it to different "platforms".    Also, "hosted" is of course the wrong word, "implemented atop" would be better.   
从去年开始，一直能感受到来自周围朋友的、来自业界的明确的、清新的、旺盛的创业冲动，这种似曾熟悉、有些陌生的感觉已经有五年时间没有感受到了。我们已经欣喜地看到了一条条鲜活的小龙，给我们带来了又一轮的“吐故纳新”： 比蒙科技 :: 业界独特的透明桥方式的安全审计技术，支持SSH/远程桌面RDP/VNC/Telnet/HTTP/FTP/Oracle/Sybase/MS SQL等等大多数运维应用和协议，为内控和符合性之旅提供不可替代的工具。都是业界老兵  安言咨询 :: 已经名声鹊起的安全培训业务，带动了面向BS7799/ISO27001的安全咨询业务，独特的市场合作模式赢得了很多伙伴的支持。CCClub是安言为圈子的重要贡献。  大成天下 :: ”铁卷“提供了众多数据敏感组织和部门都需要的文档安全解决方案，满足当前内控和符合性之旅的这一重要需求。另外，"游刃”基线风险评估系统也是很棒的选择，回想一下Xscan的简捷就可以想象，呵呵。是Xfocus兄弟的主创。  中盈信安 :: 大家都很熟悉的CNNOG大会给了我们中盈信安的第一印象，其“安全咨询＋内网控制产品解决方案”已经有了相当好的开端。  华凯兴 :: 脚踏热的烫手的统一威胁管理UTM，产品莆一推出很快就获得市场的相当认可，接连不断的OEM伙伴给了XScreen广阔的天地。
今天早上，Bill推荐了一个网站http://www.hamachi.cc，过去一看，厉害，这不就是正宗的七层Overlay Network吗？这就是传说中的边界杀手吗？不要说边界越来越模糊了，边界已经消失了。 前段时间大家一直在谈论IM/P2P的出现如何如何使企业的网络边界被腐蚀、如何造成企业安全策略的妥协，，这种腐蚀和妥协表现在随意、不受控的文件共享、不受控的信息交换等，但是毕竟在网络层边界的两边没有建立直接的连接，边界的防火墙、反病毒、IDS等设施和安全策略还在一定程度上起作用。但是Hamachi的出现改变了这一切。 原来大家都有一个小秘密，就是TOR（The Onion Router）的使用，这个软件可以帮助你实现匿名的、虚拟网络连接，你自己不知道你的出口在哪里，没有人知道，反正国外的网站连上了。现在Hamachi的出现使得TOR相形见拙。 Hamachi安装后会创建一个新的虚拟网络端口，使得设置在一个群网中的Hamachi客户端就像在一个局域网中一样的网络连接，提供了防火墙/NAT 的穿越能力，提供了开放协议的身份、认证、数据加密保护，可以方便给网络管理员审计接口，另外还有一些很有吸引力的小功能，例如下面的内置Web代理：  Built-in Web proxy   An option to use Hamachi as a simple web proxy. This way your Hamachi peers may configure their Web browsers to access the Internet via your computer and therefore protect their Web traffic while it is in transition between you and them.  This feature is typically used for securing Web surfing from untrusted locations including cybercafes, coffee houses, hotels, etc   这样，虽然Hamachi安装后在新端口上自动应用缺省的防火墙安全策略，但是，Hamachi的出现还是又给桌面安全管理出了个难题，我们该如何应对层出不穷的P2P应用？边界可以重建吗？
Damn, how am I gonna sleep tonight after reading this? :-)
Actually it is for Google. They are great at this.
a better site is www.channelking.com
What's unreal about Python/Ruby?
um, why does one need to ask the world what language to learn?  Why not just learn em all?
Where there is money to be made, there will always be scams, and the Internet and music download services in particular are no exception. It is sad to read in online forums how many people are so easily fooled by these scams. This story has some good information on specific sites to avoid and general tips to avoid getting scammed.
It's also true, but not appreciated, that practically all non-violent traditions today can be traced back to early christians, if not even to Christ. Gandhi? Well, let's see, he was surrounded by christian pacifist Quakers. He corresponded with Tolstoy, who was a Christian anarcho-pacifist inspired by the underground russian church, which is ancient and also pacifistic (see this book: http://allgodsword.com/Trs/). I would be interested if you could find a true pacifist (in other words one who categorically refuses violence, instead of one who rejects it for practical or utilitarian reasons) who was an atheist, and didn't have a close connection to christian pacifist traditions.
everyone on reddit will hate me, but i'm still the most  productive in statically-typed languages with rich tools support:   i.e., C# + VS, Java + Eclipse I love haskell, scheme, ruby: they usually produce cleaner, more concise, prettier code.   Even still, because of the fantastic IDE+library support you can get for Java / .NET, they're still more efficient overall.
Thumbs up for the "climate change" definition. Hilarity hijinx!
Wise up: (from http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Goy) "Goy (Hebrew: גוי, plural goyim גוים) is a transliterated Hebrew word which translates as "nation" or "people", but often used to describe one who is not a Jew." And: "In the Hebrew Bible, goy and its variants appear over 550 times in reference to Israelites and to Gentile peoples....While the earlier books of the Hebrew Bible often use goy to describe the Israelites, the later ones tend to apply the term to other nations." And: "False claims Claims that the word goy literally means "cattle" in Hebrew and it has consequently been appropriated to denigrate Gentiles because of these alleged etymological beginnings are false: no linguistic basis supports either of these assertions. As explained above, goy had its origins in the Bible to mean "nation" or "people" and applied to Jews and Gentiles alike." 
I too was forced to use Ubuntu for a while when my Mac's harddrive decided to die. I was pleasantly surprised when I finally got it all working. Of course it doesn't compare but it was good backup for a week.
&gt;Plant dud rounds and faulty explosives throughout the country and let Darwin do the hard work. Oh yes, you didn't sign the [Ottawa Treaty](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ottawa_Treaty).  Tell me, do you believe America is not obliged to restrain itself from any atrocity?
&gt;Observation #5: Software engineers have been led to believe that they are incapable of predicting where their applications spend most of their execution time. Therefore, they don't bother improving performance of sections of code that are obviously bad because they have no proof that the bad section of code will hurt overall program performance. Why should I spend time improving the performance of a section of "obviously bad" code before I know that it hurts overall program performance?
That's simply insane to make so much money, when you are 18.
I bet the combined IQ of a few million monkeys could trump the combined IQ in the gathering...  however, I'm still waiting for a work of shakespeare to be produced by them.
9 out of 10 people prefer cats to wave equations.
What language to learn _next_.
boring article. I read most of it anyway. probably all true on some level, but is this seriously the best the reddit community can come up with?
Savages.
Me neither. I use [Mozilla Firefox](http://www.getfirefox.com) with [adblock plus](https://addons.mozilla.org/firefox/1865/) and [Filterset.G](http://www.pierceive.com/)  Didn't see **any** ad.  Most of the time all ads and popups are blocked.
ruby and python are lisp wannabees.  Why settle for half-baked solution ?  Why not make full step ?  I made my choice when i was in a similar situation - Lisp.  And for web development there are several lisp solutions - Ucw, WebActions, K-Pax, TBNL.
And a few hundred years to become civilized human beings... though I doubt they will have that much time.
Someone please show me a picture of the wireless networks.
Stupid Judge.  Imagine what would happen if this was a child being molested by his/her parents: parent would have been convicted and child would be on his own. It makes no sense, the Judge must take care of every consequence of a sentence. 
"totally peaceful lifestyle..." except when he was helping brits massacre zulus in the Anglo-Boer war of south africa! http://www.howcomyoucom.com/articles/nov282000.htm
those bloody Yaks!
Here is one generic security framework for your reference:    1. One Priority: Execution  2. Two Hands: Technology and Management  3. Three Layers: Decision Makers, Managers, and Execution  4. Four Phases: Plan, Do, Check, Act  5. Five Layer Controls: Control Environment, Risk Assessment, Control Activities, Information and Communications, Monitoring  6. Six Risk Elements: Assets, Threats, Vulnerabilities, Safeguards, Risks and Opportunities  7. Seven Information Criteria: Confidentiality, Integrity, Availability, Efficiency, Effectiveness, Compliance, Reliability  8. Eight IT Processes: Planning and Organization, Acquisition &amp; Implementation, Delivery and Support, Monitoring and Evaluation It can help you master the concept of internal control, security comprehensively.
that the brief definition of my security 2.0:  * Security 2.0.1: focus changed to internal control and security protection of applications and data, rather than simple virus/intrusion detection and attacks.   * Security 2.0.2: "holistic security" synergizing the AAAA(Account, Authentication, Authorization, and Audit), from just stack/heap of firewalls, IDSs and other single point stuff.   * Security 2.0.3: emphasizing the perception and experience of those security managers and administrators, ie. the real effectiveness and efficiency. along with the implementation of technologies of data mining and correlation. there are more and more quotes to "Security 2.0". what's your understanding and idea of security 2.0?
a good idea. there should be a subreddit under security.reddit.com
The Daily Show and The Colbert Report. You know, for the Truthiness.
Hi! Good site! The http://www.sdshoes.org/ - new impotant info hare! Successes by all!
The sci.physics FAQ has had an article on chemical means of altering nuclear decay rates for years. http://math.ucr.edu/home/baez/physics/ParticleAndNuclear/decay_rates.html Summary - effects are real but are generally too small to be useful.
Hi! Good site! The http://www.sdshoes.org/ - new impotant info hare! Successes by all!
You may be interested in Daniel Dennet's TED talk where he discusses morality and not being religious: http://www.ted.com/tedtalks/tedtalksplayer.cfm?key=d_dennett 
I see... I'm glad I'm not an epsilon.
vader after therapy
Eventually future computers will obviate optimization.  They will calculate everything instantaneously.  (I was going to say Quantum computers, but Wikipedia said: *"This dramatic advantage of quantum computers is currently known to exist for only those three problems: factoring, discrete logarithm, and quantum physics simulations."*) 
how did he get his original receipts back?  :)
Yes, but Israeli policy is strengthening those organizations, not weakening them.  I'm astonished the Israelis are this stupid.
Actually it will recommend running it on GNU/Hurd
I have no clue if that is true ! But it is some crazy info !
Emit poisonous gas if it gets moved without the key. Better still, buy a shitty car - it don't matter if it gets stolen.
Osama bin Ladin's rise is a *consequence* of US policy.  Simple as that.  Your enemies are the monsters you have created, just as Hamas (Israel's attempt to undermine Fateh) have become Israel's enemies.  As for your enemies being poised to attack---it strikes me that the US and Israel have been doing most of the attacking, and killing, of late.  You really can't expect people to believe the defensive posture, at least people with access to unfiltered news. As a matter of interest, use of language aside, where do you disagree with bin Laden's statement of the facts?
thanks for the link
This is really hillarious to me because I have a friend that signs with a CRAZY signature.  Once, however, she did get asked if that was her actual signature.  Fortunately it matched.
&gt; no, but too often anti-semites use the veil of political   &gt; protest to hide their true feelings of hatred towards the   &gt; jewish people. And too often the Israelis hide behind accusations of anti-semitism when criticised for their atrocities.
Recently i had some code from a friend. It was dealing with some communication packets and getting the data out. The normal way was to call a get function. He optimized it by accessing the struct directly. "A function call, push and pop to stack, yadayada, it *must* be faster this way.", he said. Well i examined how this get function works. Half preprocessor macro, half inline function. In the core it just did the exact same struct access. So we got nothing out of his "optimization", except that the code will break, if we change the struct. For beginners it is best to stick to Hoares quote just like most of us do. If you do projects with lot of high-something adjectives, you should have the experience when to break rules.
They managed to sell us more shit.  Yay!
What is his slashdot uid?
My neighbor does cycling competitions, works for Patagonia, etc., and he said it would have made no sense for Landis to use testosterone at the point at which he tested positive for it. EPO or extra blood would have been useful, but not a muscle-builder. Can anyone think of any reason why this would make sense? And if not, why isn't this being mentioned more prominently?
It would also be a good idea to do a count of a random sampling of paper ballots, sufficient to discourage tampering.  In addition, suspicions of foul play could trigger a manual count, if for instance there were statistically unlikely disagreements between exit polls and results.
It's shocking how sensible Pat Buchanan can be.
Ouch, never heard of this arc thing, but it seems a terrible idea to me. We don't need another programming language. We definitively do not need another lisp dialect. We do not need another hero, we've already got Paul Graham, and he even  complains himself that too much of what he says gets posted to reddit!
Pythonachu, I choose you!
Ironically, the article kind of shares the mentality of the over-protective parents: kids must be exposed to just the right level of adversity, or they'll end up pathetic and useless! My childhood was probably over-sheltered. So what??!! You learn to cope with adversity in your 20's. End of story.
You also probably want to count a sub-sample in each riding, to make certain that it reflects the final (electronic) total. Discrepancies mean counting more paper votes, potentially up to a full recount.
This report is not talking about medical use of these drugs, it is talking about people like this http://img354.imageshack.us/img354/1289/pumped1qj.jpg   
Is that really the case? Is that factoring in that we only have 1/10th the population? I have to admit, I've never heard about anyone waiting 3+ hours in line to vote in Canada. It may be a question of how much money is spent at election time -- more counters, more voting locales.
Excellent article; read it. Yes, especially if you lean towards thinking Israel is legitmitately defending itself against terrorists. For once, try and read a dissenting voice.
Developer Irrational Games tells why they hate Electronic Arts so much.
You misunderstand the goal of propaganda. The goal of the Israeli, or tobacco industry or petroleum industry, propagandists isn't to make you believe their crap. Their goal is to make you doubt their enemies. The propagandists work on the well-established principle that presented with three options in a sequence, people (and even animals) will tend to pick the middle one. For instance, presented with a humongous TV costing 2000$ and what you really need, a cheap 50$ piece of scrap, people will buy a 500$ TV. The mere presence of the 2000$ TV makes the 500$ one seem so perfectly reasonable. Presented with anti-Israeli truth and pro-Israeli lies, people will tend to believe something in between. So long as people doubt that Israel is a Nazi state (a racist, Fascist state engaged in genocide) the propagandists win. You might also want to check out items 4 and 16 of this [handy little list that tells you exactly what Israel is](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Psychopathy_Checklist-Revised_%28PCL-R%29#Psychopathy_Checklist-Revised_.28PCL-R.29)
And yet reddit is powered by python.  Highly unreal....
Speak for youself... universities here in the UK teach that in the 1st year.
Damn fucking straight. I never was in America at all.
The original "casu marzu" it's only for true men, only Chuck Norris can stand that. For the tourists, here in sardinya, we have a "larves free" version, made up with fusion salts.  Gif: http://www.digivalfx.net/ynd04/ynd4084g.jpg BTW, we don't eat this every day. The others day, we rest our liver eating at MC-Donalds, just like the rest of the world. About eating the sheperd, I think its not the best Idea:  http://www.artel.it/agrpress/TN_past%20sardo%2058%202090.JPG Greetings from Sardinya :-)   
1. I don't mind because I don't have a dog. 2. If I had it, I would mind, because you're attacking my property. 3.I don't mind if you beat up your own dog and then eat it.
Reddit is a relatively small project.
Bread from most shops is crap compared with home-made bread.
Why not apply some science:  http://newton.ex.ac.uk/teaching/resources/CDHW/egg/
Keep in mind that [this](http://popvssoda.com/) is the generic word for soft drink - so some people **actually** call 7Up and Mountain Dew "Coke".
My priorities: 1. Tastyness. 2. Cost. Anything else is just a nice bonus.
you are so very correct, oops
hah you beat me to the punch....that its crazy that your mailing list posts get posted to reddit there almost needs to be a subreddit: pg.reddit.com
Holy crap. Why? WHY???
Batman Begins sequel confirmed
&gt; The worst misinterpreted bit is part that says "no one can   &gt; come to the Father except through me." Soooo many people   &gt; think this means "if you believe that Jesus was the Son of   &gt; God and is your Saviour then you get to Go to Heaven". [...]  &gt; It means that the only way to heaven is to follow his   &gt; teachings. That is the way to heaven. That is how one is   &gt; saved. This was the precise point of contention between Luther and the Catholic Church.  Most protestant denominations believe in 'justification by faith alone', where Catholicism expects both faith and good works.
Lua
LOL, fantastic!  "For us, Satan is a symbol of freedom, liberty and pride, which we think is a wonderful thing"... For those who want to mod up the original submission: http://reddit.com/info/8un5/comments
&gt; The whole "the Bible has been slowly edited over the years"   &gt; idea has never stood up well to evidence. Granted, there are   &gt; some horrible translations, but there are quite a few   &gt; scholarly translations with integrity. There have been improvements, but frankly, the closer one looks the at the Biblical texts, the more dodgy it looks.  The bible (even the New Testament) is patched together from contradictory sources. For example, the attribution of the gospels to the evangelists, and the choice of gospels by the council of Nicea is largely synthetic.  The bible is a human creation, containing myriads of textual errors, misattributions, elisions, and reconstruction.  A little like a Monet, the closer you get, the less it all coheres. &gt; These people are dead serious don't mess around with   &gt; translation errors; after all, they consider the Bible the   &gt; Word of God, and thus want to portray it as accurately as   &gt; possible. The fact that they consider the Bible to be the word of god might bias them somewhat, no?  The bible is the word of various authors (even Genesis is the fusion of two somewhat contradictory texts, two creation myths, etc).  There is no unitary consciousness, nor even any consensus on what happened during the life of Jesus.
You might have it backwards---if teachers are paid well, the profession will attract more able people. For example, in Ireland 20 years ago, teaching was well-paid, and teachers had high status in the community.  Now, with economic growth, teachers are relatively poorer paid, and have been subject to various attacks by the right.  The calibre of trainees has dropped noticeably. When society places a premium on the education of its young, teaching will enjoy a high status, and attract motivated and able people.
This article is actually a very sophisticated piece of propaganda. I don't dispute any of its facts. And it's good to reflect on all the contradictions and hypocrisy, filth and evil, that's involved in war. But the article does far more than that. It suggests first of all that there is some kind of moral equivalency between on one hand Hezbollah's launching ineffective rockets on their enemy in order to inflict economic damage (with minimal loss of human life). And on the other hand, the IDF's racist campaign of slaughter of the Lebanese civilian population. Not only that, but the article's author has the fucking nerve to condemn the only effective weapon in the hands of Hezbollah all for the sake of the "purity" of photo-journalism. Truly, we are dealing with loathesome creatures. As for Hezbollah's alleged corraling of civilians? I really doubt it. The IDF really doesn't need anyone's help to conduct a massacre. And if they did? Then it would fall under collateral damage. Unlike the IDF's deliberate targeting of civilian infrastructure, leveling of houses, and so on and so forth.
You know, you joke about it but I've got a disturbing feeling that they actually do get hard ons from all the slaughter.
Apparently, the key is to cool it *and* embed it in metal.
I have a Hindu friend whose dad still believes that the Earth rests upon tortoises (or was it elephants), anywayswhen my friend showed him images of Earth from space he simply replied that the tortoises (or elephants) were obviously underneath the Earth and therefore you can never take a picture of them.  His mum makes good curry.  My friend is getting an arranged marriage.
Bhutan and how tourism may spoil its way of life
Nice straw man attack. There's a big difference between saying Israel has some responsibility for one particular war and saying Jews are responsible for all wars. But thanks for helping to conflate the two: you've just unwittingly scored a point for the antisemites.
Consonance concisely conveys caricatures concerning characters.
Well, you raise an interesting point. Is it just medical damage, or social damage? Going to the source document: http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/shared/bsp/hi/pdfs/31_07_06_drugsreport.pdf "24. We were surprised to discover a marked divergence of views between the then Home  Secretary and the Chairman of the ACMD on the extent to which consideration of social  harm fell within the Council’s remit. During exchanges following his statement on the  classification of cannabis on 19 January 2006, the then Home Secretary Charles Clarke  repeatedly asserted that “clinical, medical harm is the advisory council’s predominant  consideration”.33 Andy Hayman, Chairman of the Association of Chief Police Officers  (ACPO) Drugs Committee and member of the ACMD, reinforced this view, telling us:  “What is directing what classification a drug goes into is the scientific and medical harm. It  has no relationship with the crime that might be associated with it”.34 However, in evidence  to this inquiry, Sir Michael Rawlins, Chairman of the Council, directly contradicted this,  telling us that social harms (including association with crime) were given “equal weight” in  the ACMD’s deliberations.35 The fact that the Chairman of the ACMD and the Home  Secretary have publicly expressed contradictory views about the remit of the Council is  perturbing. Home Office Minister Vernon Coaker’s attempts to reconcile these  diametrically opposed positions in evidence to us were not entirely successful but the  Minister at least appeared to recognise that social harm should be taken into account by the  Council in developing its recommendations.36 The ACMD must look at social harm in its  considerations—it is impossible to assess accurately the harm associated with a drug  without taking into account the social dimensions of harm arising from its misuse."
Around Boston many people say "tonic".
The comment about parents ignoring aggression in video games is quite telling, are these hyper-anxious parents just ignoring the effects of video games or are they actually happy that the aggression is channeled into a physically safe space?
There's a real limit to how much you can save on economies of scale. Most of the hugeness in business these days has more to do with data processing power than with any measurable benefits to bigger factories or warehouses.  With a big honkin' corporate Oracle server (hold your comments, open source junkies: I'm just making a point), a company can integrate its operations on a much bigger scale across a much longer supply chain.  The profit per unit may not be higher (except insofar as that long supply chain can reach out to a cheap labour zone, which is *not* the same as a productivity gain per unit of work), but the total volume is much greater, meaning more money and a bigger office for the CEO.
A couple more in addition to reddit:  Google uses python on internal projects and project hosting  Yahoo uses it as part of its maps site  Large newspaper sites run on python  Dreamworks uses python for it's distributed 3d rendering framework on its render farm
Arab is an ethnicity while Jew is a religion. Comparing the two is common but it's a category error. I looked it up. Very interesting on the Cohen gene. As for the attempted alliance, well I knew my source was flaky in the extreme. Makes me wonder what actual facts I can pull out of it, if any.
&gt; Whereas it would be nice to be off the hook as they say, if the RIAA cannot simply point to the individual paying for an Internet connection, as the one responsible for all activity, I certainly would think twice before opening up my wireless network to the neighborhood. Wouldn't it be enough to claim that your wifi was only open *by the time* file sharing over your IP "occured"? Of course, once you realised that someone might be abusing your internet access you immediately secured your wifi ...
I noticed "diabetes in a can" wasn't one of the tracked generic names.
I am still finding it difficult to believe that when asked for the generic name for a soft drink people replied "Coke", I kind of feel they misinterpreted the question. And given your link to the "Other" responses, with names such as "Dr Pepper", "7Up", "Sprite" etc. proving popular, maybe the question was indeed misinterpreted.  Unless someone here can verify that Coke can indeed refer to a request for a Sprite. I was surprised that "Historically, the correct term is 'phosphate', which was defined by soda jerks as being a flavored syrup mixed with carbonated water. 'Soda's were what we today call floats. Therefore Soda is clearly WRONG and pop is more acceptable as a shortening of phosphate." was so popular.
i found this artist on the web...his illustrations are about girls, girls and girls!  very nice and sexy!!!!  great works:):):):)
I love parasite talk.
"Coke" meaning a generic term for soda is commonly used throughout the American South. I have several friends who swear by it. Haven't you ever talked to a Southerner?
Yes, but I think everybody on the internet has seen this at least four times.
This whole thing is a figment of your imagination...
What they mean by harm: Assessment of harm  92. We were interested to find out the criteria used by the ACMD in making its  assessments of harm. The ACMD told us that Professor Nutt and his colleagues on the  ACMD Technical Committee had developed a risk assessment matrix to evaluate the  harms associated with different drugs (see Table 3). Professor Nutt said: “The matrix was  developed when I was working on the Runciman Report because it became quite clear that  we did not have any systematic way of conceptualising the range of harms and any way of  properly categorising them and rating them […] When I became a member of the ACMD  and Chairman of the Technical Committee, we set in process this procedure of getting all  the members of the Technical Committee to work through in a systematic way the  drugs”.187 The Minister, referring to the matrix, told us: “We have a scientific basis for  determining harm. The ACMD refer to that when they classify drugs”.188  Table 3: ACMD Risk Assessment Matrix  Category Parameter  Acute  Chronic  Physical harm  Parenteral  Intensity of pleasure  Psychological dependence  Dependence  Physical dependence  Intoxication  Other social harms  Social harms  Healthcare costs  93. Professor Colin Blakemore pointed out, however, that it was not trivial to “decide what  weighting to give to the different criteria for harm”. We asked the ACMD to explain how it  determined the weighting given to harm in each domain. In response, the ACMD stated:  “using [the ACMD Risk Assessment] matrix, and assigning a score to each parameter (0 =  no risk; 1 = some risk; 2 = moderate risk; 3 = extreme risk), Professor Nutt and his  colleagues have developed an overall harm rating. They have not, as yet, attempted to  weight individual parameters”.189 We welcome the initiative taken by the ACMD  Technical Committee to develop a standard framework for the assessment of harm but  we also note that determining harm scores using the matrix is almost as much an art as  a science.
If TIME can do it...
cool
I'm one. Thing is, KIPPERS doesn't really describe many of the boomerangs today, because the cash flow often goes the other way (from child -&gt; parent).  I and many of my friends moved back home after college, but then went and got jobs (often making more than our parents) and pay "rent" for staying at home.  We contribute to our parents' retirement savings, not eat it. There's a strong economic argument for this.  Rent today is *expensive*.  Our parents are usually living in houses that are too big for their needs once the kids move out.  They aren't going to rent out our rooms to strangers - that would just be weird.  So the kids come back home, pay rent, the parents pay off the mortgage faster (my first 7 months of rent shaved a year off my parents' mortgage), and the kids get a chance to find their footing in the working, financial world one step at a time.   
This is SO old and its been proven to be an Urban Legend many times.
Do not be so proud of this attireological terror you have constructed.
Let's see...if you said this kind of shit aloud in Europe, but about the "staging of the holocaust", you'd be on trial now, no?  Well, I guess that's different, somehow.
cool
This makes me laugh because I had exactly this argument yesterday with a coworker.
Don't you know that by donning The Robe, they become much wiser than we untermenschen? It's stories like this that really help you appreciate the wisdom of those who push for oligarchy run by judges, i.e., people who are both lawyers *and* politicians.
what cheersweetie said!!
this story rules!
eew!
yes, because the jews were innocent, and these people were harboring(aiding and abedding) terrorists(in their city, in their apartment buildings, and even as a part of their government)
But it's *democracy*! You know, all of us working together for the common good.
amazing
Is customer support from Dell worst than what u get from Acer or Toshiba? I don't think so. I like Dell, it's the only company that would declare how many slots of RAM it would use, and the speed in RPM of hard-drives and the only one on the market that could slap an italian keyboard on a PC bought in Ireland... otherwise i would have had to order my PC from Dell Italy with tons of hassles because the shipping address doesnt match the billing address. Most PC suck nowadays: i don't think there's one really better than another.
This has got to be the best ever.
Google extends adsense with site diagnostics
Unbelievable
Maybe it represents a hunger for Arc news.
Is this the best the Reddit community can come up with? I've always thought, on a community bookmarking site - and again, I don't know, I've only frequented reddit and Fark, that there's a process. They call them up/downvoting. And they don't always go with the best, but they go with whatever won. So is it the best? According to the process. The most impressive? I thought the Java story links were impressive. I think, oftentimes, the poster that knows they can't win can speak the most freely, because, otherwise, sites with titles like "reddit" or "lisp roxxors" or "python and ruby 4 teh win" will jump on it. And that's juvenile theater.
&gt;Yet in the midst of his shooting spree in Seattle Friday, he declared himself an angry Muslim.
nothing to say
you should look here:  http://west-wind.com/weblog/posts/4493.aspx
I'm a limey pomme, so unless you're talking about someone from Cornwall, Portsmouth or Brighton, it's a rare occasion I chat with someone from the south of the US.   We're all soft/fizzy drink round here (well in my Uni days it used to be non-(beer/alcohol) drink).
How come so simple food items are now filled with chemical crap? Eggs have been in the human diet for a long time, and we start putting ink on them because some people are too lazy to learn how to cook them? How does such a thing happen? Another inventor of an egg-cooking device tells that it must be cooked "8.5 minutes without reaching boiling point". Then I don't see how making a logo appear on an egg after 8.5 minutes is going to prevent the water from boiling and overcooking the egg, nor how it is different from setting a timer for 8.5 minutes, except that you're paying for industrial eggs from chicken raised in battery farms and with added chemical ink. Thanks, but no thanks. I'll use my mechanical watch. [edit: typo]
Everybody has seen this before, but I was just telling someone about it last week, so I'm really glad it popped up (no pun intended -- besides, it's soda). I wish it was more up to date. I'm sure it wouldn't change much, but more data would reduce the margin of error and possibly change things in a few areas.
Nobody should write a stateful webapp until they've read up on [REST](http://www.ics.uci.edu/~fielding/pubs/dissertation/top.htm), understand why the web was initially designed to be stateless, and have worked on (or at least thought through) a multi-server webapp. *Then* (and only then) they can start judiciously adding state back in response to customer requirements.  But many novice web developers paint themselves into a corner through overuse of cookies, session beans, webserver-local files, and in-memory data.  They build this glorious interactive webapp and then find it breaks horribly under load and there's no way to cluster it without massively rearchitecting the internals.  Or they start getting complaints from organizational servers that it doesn't work with their proxy server.  Or they find that caching product X (Google Web Accelerator, Akamai, whatever) doesn't work with their website.  Or they're unable to write automated tests for their webapp and have to laboriously run through a whole interaction manually each time they change something.
What judge?  There doesn't seem to have been any involvement from the judicial system at all beyond the initial conviction of the owners.  People aren't doing anything because a court order would take too long and they're afraid of being held liable.  In neither case is there a judge somewhere holding things up. At least in the US, the criminal courts don't deal with child custody issues as your post implies.  When the parents are first arrested, the children are placed with a relative or in foster care by a DHS (dept. of human services) branch, not by the presiding judge over the abuse case.  We even have mandatory minimum sentencing laws, removing even the possibility that the consequences of a sentence can be considered.   
you will never get deals on parts like Dell or Newegg
The biggest problem I saw in academia (and I've spent a lot of time there) is that about 80% of the students DO NOT belong there!  Universities, even major ones, are degree mills.  It is astoundingly difficult to find truly intellectually curious people amidst all the consensus and conformism.   The funny thing is, the major southern university I was affiliated with is putting up new buildings as though building as fast as it can and is even opening a separate campus so it can keep putting up buildings when the current campus runs out of space.  It is unfashionable to only be status quo, universities have to grow at a cancerous rate for some reason.  Hmmm.  Cancer is a good word. My humble prognosis is that the whole college/university "system" as we know it has less than ten more years.
Not quite ASPCA I bet.
yup, you're a troll. false arguments used:  assuming extreme position (there's a latin name for this one but I can't find it), ad hominem, non-sequitur, etc.  edit: [here's a good list](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Logical_fallacy) I was thinking of False Dilemma...
ok, però non approfondisce molto ...
Awesome music video made by four guys using eight treadmills
Dude, he's kicked the crap out of you - let it go!
I live in Houston, TX and "Coke" is the generally accepted term.  I actually call it coke and I can't stand the stuff. We have a coke bottling plant here in Houston so I can kinda see why but I don't get why others do.
Worst thing is, some of this is made into law, so you *must* have all those good-for-nothing, false-sense-of-security devices and processes. For a family with more than two kids, you can no longer ride a car in North America. You need a minivan or something just to accommodate all the boosters you're mandated to have. This fits into a larger theme: behavior that was normative two generations ago becomes tainted within the span of a single lifetime, or even forbidden by law. Guess it's a good thing for black people in Alabama, borderline good in some cases, and deplorable in this safety mania that I would, given the chance, include myself out of. All of this was anticipated by a Playboy rant back in 1976 called "The Safety Fetishists". (That proves how old I am, and that yes, *I read it for the articles*.) Guess Mr Ralph Nader's penance in hell will be suffocation with airbags.
My personal favorite: &gt;If Darwinism can be taught in schools, ID should be too, students have the right to hear ALL the theories. Stop pretending like FSMism is a real theory. Instead of coming up with random crap you might actually try and intelligently promote your ideas without offending people.
First time I enountered "pop" in conversation, I thought someone was making some 1950s joke that I wasn't aware of.
It really depends. I hate to generalize, but I had a friend who grew up in the suburbs, and his mom was always worried sick when he came to visit me in Big Bad East York. I think the safety bubble of *not* being in the city can really stifle a kid's independence. (being in the country can be huge, though; the few farm kids I've known have all been extremely pragmatic and reasonable, from dealing with money, machinery, animals, neighbours, etc.) But again, it depends on the parent. My mom had me running errands to the milk store at about 7, and by age 10, I had a paper route pulling in $60-$90 every month. My parents *never* went to bat for me against teachers, no matter how injusticed I felt. That having been my experience, I'm sure it will inform my own future parenting decisions. Part of being loving is being a hardass and forcing a kid to make decisions, take responsibility, and live with consequences.
&gt;So raising two children costs you the price of 3 houses. It's no wonder that two wages are insufficient to cover this.  What typically happens to middle-class families that try to raise children in a middle class lifestyle (good education, good environment, etc) is that they get bumped down to working class through the intermediary of a bankruptcy. ...
Of course it is. Of course.  And it shows!
The southern end of the highway is a "super port" on the Mexican Pacific coast.  The northern end is a distribution point in the center of America. The purpose is to provide another way in and out of the American market that doesn't depend on California longshoremen and can't be stopped by a disruption of a single mode of transportation (rail).
I haven't.  Thanks falsestprophet.
Sounds like one.  But I don't see it at any myth buster sites.
Risk of enteric myiasis: intestinal larval infection. Piophila casei larvae can pass through the stomach alive (human stomach acids do not usually kill them) and take up residency for some period of time in the intestines, where they can cause serious lesions as they attempt to bore through the intestinal walls. Symptoms include nausea, vomiting, pain in the abdomen, and bloody diarrhea That is cool - have to taste that!
It's the fourth on eleven... yes it's in the top 4!
Do you think traditional media is afraid of blogs much? How about this: "Traditional Media Incapable of Writing Article on Technology Without Several Blatant Inaccuracies". Seriously, do they ever get it right?
The Ewoks got to him?
Dallas, Coke is the term here, too.  You order a coke, they ask which kind, you say Dr. Pepper.  Odd, but it works.
Very interesting observation about businesses trying to be 'hip' and 'down with the kidz' with their approach to blogs by the CEO's
Very cool site!  We often wonder what just played on KUSC or KMZT, where the announcers drop their voices as they name the composer or the piece.  This one gets bookmarked.
It sounds like the old (fake) Traffic Light hack from a few years ago....
An old article descirbing Og can be found here: http://www.rubygarden.com/index.cgi/Libraries/og_tutorial.rdoc Og has advanced considereably since then though ;-) Also, have a look at the videos: http://nitroproject.org/videos/nitro4.html  http://nitroproject.org/videos/nitro.html  http://nitroproject.org/videos/nitro3.html   
I think they need to increase their sample size in their survey of Alaska: http://www.popvssoda.com/countystats/AK-stats.html
I don't think your point about booster seats is a good example.  Probably not in the category of coddling since an accident can really harm a child much more than an adult. That is, it really is a life-saving device, as opposed to rubber floors on playgrounds. But I very much agree with your point in general.
where can i buy a ubuntu installed laptop in tokyo?
Every "security expert" argueing any system is 100% secure should be banned from ever working in any security-related job again.
Awesome!  Perfectly laid out and TRUE!
I think dealing with a Jewish mother is essentially the opposite of coddling.  You are dealing with a completely irrational, neurotic and devious human being, which really ends up making the rest of the world seem easy.
So finally here are the results of the 1st Unofficial Indian Public Relations survey. We have Text 100, Ogilvy, Perfect Relations, IPAN, 20:20 Media, Lewis PR, Bluelotus, Genesis, and Vaishnavi being voted by participants as the agencies with the best working culture. Under the agencies with the worst working culture, we have Perfect Relations, yes again, Corporate Voice, IPAN, Genesis PR, and Prism PR. 
LOL LOL LOL
Agreed.  This is a long-boring article reiterating facts that are obvious.  How does this get to be the number one selection?
This is great news, though I don't know how appropriate the words &amp;ldquo;FINALLY!!&amp;rdquo; or &amp;ldquo;Reliable&amp;rdquo; are in the title, what with the article saying &amp;ldquo;While it’s beta and early days yet...&amp;rdquo;
*I'm currently leaning toward Python and began doing so last week.*  seems jeremy has already decided.
&gt; With LM, password hashes were split into two separate 7-character hashes. They did WHAT??? &gt; A more realistic time for the average user may be 90-120 days.  I'd have said twice a year (every 6 months) is a good password change interval. What's far more important is training your users in protecting their passwords... Ensure they have a decent typing speed. Hunt and peck password entry makes it far too easy to get the password by watching. Even better, one night, after everyone's gone home, go through the offices pulling post it notes off the underside of all the keyboards (or other favourite hiding places), and when people ask for a password change in the morning, remind them not to write their password down :) 
*cough* that's not true *cough*
No, I did not suggest not trying to meet people. It's part of normal life to be social. I just suggested not to do efforts you don't really like to do like wearing trendy clothes or going to stupid music clubs you don't like just in order to pick up girls, because you are destined to meet people you have karmic connection with, you couldn't even avoid it, so you don't really need to go out of your way to give karma a chance - it already has it.
Noone is saying they should be punished, but if the NBA can legally get out of the deal they should do it.
I don't even know if he's doing that.  I think Cohen uses Borat as a tool to expose bias and ignorance, not to mention just to be damn silly.
This is on the order of Mel Brooks' Producers:  in an interview, MB said that he wanted to blast the Nazis by making them as laughable as possible.
[http://reddit.com/info/a8zy/comments/caaqh](http://reddit.com/info/a8zy/comments/caaqh)
A program I've been in search for for ages.  Shall print out lagge posters from masked with hearts and lips photos of my beloved.
&gt; They aren't going to rent out our rooms to strangers - that would just be weird. I know a few parents who have rented rooms to students when their kids moved out, i don't see what's weird about it, it makes as much sense as having the kids stay at home until they're 35.
Buddhism is not a religion, but a scientific view on life. Therefore it's completely OK to challenge it in a scientific way, like trying to prove it's wrong and so on. What's not really OK or at least what I don't really like is dismissing it as "it's your belief, not mine". It's not a belief, it's a knowledge, therefore we like it more if our views are subject to debate than dismissing it as a belief. What I tried to prove in the first part of the blog is that as experience shows that not all people who have similar personality and interests as we ourselves become our friends, there must be another ingredient of friendship. Of course I did not prove it's a connection from former lives - it's hard to prove, maybe I'll try it in a later post. For my theory, it's enough to accept that there is a secret, hidden, non-objective ingredient to human relationships that goes beyond objective measures like similar personalities, views and interests. If you don't accept it, you are welcome to debate it (but rather as a blog comment than as a comment here). Yes, I more or less think that a soulmate must be an opposite sex clone. How else could you become really close to someone? Everything else is just a bunch of compromises like "OK, today we do what you like, tomorrow what I like". It's really far from a perfect relationship.
&gt;functional languages like Lisp   Lisp is *not* an fp,  it is a multi-paradigm programming language.  Please open a book or two.
Amen.   In fact,  I recently heard one of my colleagues call Ruby "MatzLisp"  ( is that common parlance? ).  There is no reason, except fear ( which is an excuse not a reason ),  for accepting half-measures.  Forget Python,  forget Ruby,  go straight for a Lisp dialect.
Anyway, I'm not exactly happy I managed to collect a total of zero points. Maybe I should share these views at some other website?...
What's with the naked guy in Oslo being attacked by babies? 
I'm not sure if they ship to Japan but this is a good company:  [System 76](http://system76.com/index.php)
I noticed a half-baked report on web 2.0 investments here( http://www.readwriteweb.com/archives/vc_web_20_list.php) last week and note that Library House in the uk has published a report about all UK venture-backed companies. By default, it should contain info on all UK web 2.0 companies...
The article has some merit, but is a little stereotypical (is that a word?) in some spots. Not all geeks or nerds drink mtn. dew and code all day. Some like green tea and literature or coffee and calculus. I don't know the audience of craigslist or reddit to a detail, but I expect this is "preaching to the choir".
Happens all the time in the US.  Not the Catch-22 part, but animal abandoment, especially livestock such as horses, cows, sheep, and pigs, is on the rise becaue the people who take care of the animals are elderly and when their health fails, there is often no one to look after the animals.
[blog post from the guy who blocked him](http://tawker.com/2006/08/01/i-blocked-stephen-colbert-on-wikipedia/)
That's absolutely disgusting! Cultural tolerance be damned, that's just gross! eww!
Whenever this makes the rounds, it always strikes me as incredibly condescending.  Both to geeks and girls.
I had a colleague once, a charismatic Christian from Kenya. He had a blog, but 100% of it was cut and pasted. Whenever he found a good sermon, or some other Christian writing he liked, he would cut and paste it, no attribution. I doubt his sources would have minded if they knew...  I also know a twelve-year old who did the same for his favourite football team. A news article about his heroes? Cut and paste, with HTML and all. He would even edit out the name of the journalist and the newspaper. He didn't see anything wrong with it, at least not until I pointed out it was probably not legal.
This is very funny, but I had to skip the lengthy introduction. Get to the crashy dog, already!
Spot the trend! * Expired: MySpace * Tired: YouTube * Wired: OurUndies   
Stereotyping is boring!
Yeah, you hit the head on the nail.
I grew up in Houston, &amp; we indeed used "coke" as a generic term for "cola". It could refer to a Pepsi or RC Cola as much as a Coca-Cola. Or even a Dr. Pepper or Mr. Pibb. It certainly confused me whenever I got old enough to realize that Coke was a brand name. I slowly stopped using "coke" as a generic term, but I've never been entirely comfortable with any of the alternatives. Of course, Houston had so many people move in from out-of-state, you probably find less people there these days who still use "coke" generically than you used to. I don't remember ever using "coke" to refer to Sprite or 7-Up.
Jumping junipers! Can you jokers jam a jacket on this jolly jumble of junk?
I think a 'repechage' round like this is a great idea. I liked many of the articles. How long before the 'you can have a larger penis' crowd find this thread?
We might be able to raise them from the dead, but converting them to Islam would be difficult. 
I didn't find it all that great.  I have a hard time reading stories that pick a couple quotes then base an entire theme around those quotes.  It also glosses over some important points. 1. The US isn't going to stop supporting Israel, it's currently our only real dependable ally with a democracy.  2. Both the Hizbollah and Israel currently gain from the fighting, when that stops so will the current outbreak in hostilities.  The only losers right now are the people of Lebanon. I also don’t undestand how the author can draw this conclusion “Bush is constructing a millenarian narrative” from the 2 quotes he outlined in his article.   
They screwed up on the color scheme-- the middle values are much more saturated than the lows or highs, which makes them stand out much more than the high value does. Someone needs to learn some color theory...
Won't work for me. Anyone could do it?
Yeah. Here’s another one: I grew up calling a sofa a “couch”. (Although I’ve come to understand that that is—or was—incorrect.) My maternal grandmother, though, calls a sofa a “davenport”, which always struck me a very strange.
I decided, some time ago, to only learn the language that is best for each situation. Python/Ruby fill completely identical needs. I say, just choose one or the other. Here is my basic breakdown: * assembly - to supplement c * c - of course (and not that ++ junk) * bash - for *basic* comand line interaction * python - general purpose * c# - ewww, but on occasion it's needed at the job Others to consider for special applications: * HP49 RPL - I still use the calculator a bit * java - best supported on some phones, the need for this is declining though with ports of other dynamic languages. So I chose python. Hurray for me.
It hits home.
thank you. i will call them.
The important points of this article can be summarised as: it is a better idea to date people who are nice, educated and have intelligent hobbies and interests (even if they don't overlap perfectly with yours), than to date loser [jerks/bimbos; delete as appropriate] who think that the height of entertaining extra-curricular activity is to go out and get drunk with their friends from work (assuming they are employed). To which my answer is: "well, duh."  And if you need someone to tell you this astounding fact, you're probably beyond help, and it doesn't matter how many times people tell you. It annoys me that this advice is always presented in such a needlessly specialised way, as if only women made appalling relationship choices which were bad for them, and the only non-asshole men in the whole world were computer geeks.
"Criminal Peculiarity" is a *kind* description, if you ask me ;)
I know, but more people know about the cat than the wave equation. Plus I thought it'd throw some fun into the list. :) P.S. As the submitter, I was eagerly awaiting the "this is so old" comments... and I'm *really* disappointed none showed up. I was going to upmod all of them. Seriously.
Moscow State Uni has OTIS elevators. I'm SO going to try that.
These are alimony babies :-)
Apearantly you are an Bulb programmer. But please give me the reasons why the world doesnt need another programming language?   (I am not an native English speaker/writer so there is bound to be some missspellings)
You are not supposed to eat the shell...
Resistance... not funny, you should be banned from life
"It is impossible to reason someone out of something that he did not reason himself into in the first place."  -Jonathan Swift
Why, they call them Popsicle up there.
Please stop posting this, it's a myth.
I knew a guy who had a roommate that was stealing from him. The  evidence that really broke the case was when the roommate had gone to a tanning salon, paid with my friend's credit card, but signed his _own_ name on the receipt.
Damn... he was right....   All praise Ted Stevens! *bows*
Banned FROM life.. Is that not taking it a little to personal?
&gt; Myth #5. Eventually Any Password Can Be Cracked While it would make the John the Ripper mailing list a lot quieter if people didn't naively think it was reasonable to do exhaustive searches of the printacble ASCII for 8+ characters, this is not a myth.  Eventually any password can be cracked.  An unreasonably long time with today's computers and known algorithms is not the same as never. 
For years, scientists have learned about brain development by watching the firing patterns of lab-raised brain cells. Until recently, though, the brains-in-a-dish couldn't receive information. Unlike actual gray matter, they could only send signals. Scientists at the Georgia Institute of Technology figured they could learn more from neuron clumps that acted more like real brains, so they've developed "neurally controlled animats" -- a few thousand rat neurons grown atop a grid of electrodes and connected to a robot body or computer-simulated virtual environment.
Makes 'em sound good to me! Oh wait, none of these exist in the female variety. damn
I think it's a great example.  In my mind, needing a booster seat for a kid who is 7 years old is exactly the kind of thing this social mindset leads to, and I think it's ridiculous.
It may not be enough evidance to identify the actual file sharer, but it is enough to piss off your ISP. Trust me on this one. One of my neighbors took advantage of my open WiFi network to Bittorrent the Sopranos.
With 4 hot chicks instead, this would be #1 with a bullet!
How can Hezbollah sleep knowing that all they have to do is stop attacking innocent people and the fighting will stop?   Not one, not a *single*, solitary, rocket of Hezbollah has been aimed at a military target - they have **all** been aimed at civilians! Islam is (as [Michelle Malkin](http://michellemalkin.com/) puts it) the "Religion of Perpetual Outrage" and it is getting really old.
Sorry about the troll, but...IQ is measured relative to other humans :P
I just did some traveling following the path of Bohr; particularly in Copenhagen (visiting the university, his tomb, and a few houses where he lived while studying there). Excellent picture, thanks rahul.
You are correct testosterone is not a short term performance booster, he would acure no benefit from taking one dose in the middle of the race.  It would be taken during training to increase returns then. I have no idea why that isn't mentioned more often.
&gt; Then, my Mac locked up. After I cycled the power a couple of times, it was essentially a brick. Can I blame Microsoft?  There is no reason that a user-land app should ever lock up your system. As much as we like to blame microsoft, Apple deserves considerable blame here.. Unless it was a hardware problem(?) Is this a satire of apt-get? He lists quite a few things that didn't work due to it.. Try portage next time.
Gentoo's emerge is better, I think. Depends on what you want, though.
While this might be true for games like GTA that play in a world modelled after our real present I highly doubt you could call a game like Warcraft III racist (not in the way it is meant in RL anyway, maybe speciesist or whatever it would be called is closer).
"I hope you burn in hell." Yup. Good Christian comments. Not "I will pray for you" or "I hope you come to realise the truth" or even "please repent". "I hope you burn in hell." Yup. Exactly the kind of people I would like to be friends with. *In opposite world.*
I'm rather surprised that a Honda Civic's emergency brake handle does anything except operate a cable to lock the rear brakes, i.e. a purely mechanical device. I call bs on that part of the story unless Hondas have brake by wire or some tie-in to the ignition system.  Likely his tinfoiled key still was able to start the engine.
You forgot to [s e t y o u r b r o w s e r t o t h e w i d t h o f t h i s i m a g e](http://reddit.com/info/awzd/comments/caxel)
It's nice to see someone gets it. It being the separation of church and state.  It's almost a role reversal these days. You have politicians pushing their religious views on their followers and preachers talking politics. Is there nobody that just wants to do *their* job and do it well.  Atleast this guy is.  He the first that I've heard of that makes me curious what else he has to say.  Which I guess is a pretty good indication he's doing his job right.  
shitty article, not worth the read
There's a light on the dash, isn't there?  I used to have a Civic and I can't remember.  (My Civic was stolen.  From my driveway.  In broad daylight.  It was a 2000 though, and it definitely didn't have an immobilizer; all they probably needed was a jiggler key.) 
&amp;ldquo;I can do more with this mouth than bite the head off a chicken, you know.&amp;rdquo; Oh, THAT kind of geek.
eh, it's harmless. No more condescending than the regular drivel on MSN(BC).
I remember a story about a woman who suddenly developed super strength to lift a car that collapsed on her son while he was doing some work on it. 
I'm sorry but that sounds so idiotic from here.  I had to say it!
Despite leading the world in broadband subscribers, the US  dropped from 17th to 20th place in broadband penetration over  the past year. Falling behind Sweden, the UK, and tiny Luxembourg  the US just grew by only 27.1% to 44.5% penetration from March  2005 to March 2006. Meanwhile, US broadband penetration among  active Internet users grew 1.34 percentage points to 73.1% in  June 2006.
&gt; First, the goal of terrorism isn't to scare people into not doing harm You misunderstood me.  I meant the goal of terrorists is to scare people beyond the physical harm the terrorists can actually cause.  The terrorists are militarily weak, so they try to amplify their force with fear.  They let the reaction to that fear do the damage. &gt; What freedom am I advocating that I give up? The right to a fair and speedy trial.  Thats what we've been talking about. 
This leaves a bad taste in my mouth. Does Zawodny really expect to gain something out of this? The comments on his weblog and the comments here are all pissing matches, usually substantiated only with vague generalizations or fact fudging.  Either he's just promoting traffic on his weblog or he's totally clueless about the level of debate he can get from asking the Internet "Should I learn Python or Ruby next?" Is it that hard to research two mainstream, popular languages? It's not like this is some crucial, life-or-death decision. It's not like if you learn Python you'll never be able to learn Ruby. Geez, what an overrated weblog post.
That comment about video games really upset me, no credible studies have shown significant links between video games and violence or aggression except in very young children, but the author made the statement as if the link was widely established. I agree with many of the ideas in the articles, but this one line made me worry about its scientific rigor.
It's not just this though, it's those "how to manage geeks," this, that, the other thing. You even see articles insisting that, in order to succeed in engineering or science, you have to have at least some mild form of autism. I have, when I'm not terribly busy pursuing personal projects, lab research, and my PhD, a fairly active and vibrant social life involving plenty of attractive women.  I've even had plenty of sex, despite what the article implies.
I'm not saying it's right or wrong, but there's money to be made for the guy that figures out how to break the contract. 
Another point, in many cultures having entire extended families in one home is not that unusual. I think cheap real estate (relative to many other parts of the world) and/or greater wealth have led to an American/Western cultures where kids move out into places of their own early in adulthood. 
I saw in the newspapers yesterday that Landis also brought forward that he was getting small amounts of synthetic testosterone on prescription for a medical condition. This article is old and very misleading. Not to mention that it's not the "Legal Limit" but a level of suspicion. 
The booster seat thing in Ontario is seriously absurd. My baby sister is 7, out of a car seat for years, and now suddenly she's back in one just so we don't get slapped with [a $110 fine](http://ogov.newswire.ca/ontario/GONE/2005/08/11/c9240.html?lmatch=&amp;lang=_e.html). Elpincha's right about the vehicles, too. If you've got three kids spanning less than eight years, suddenly "family sedan" doesn't cut it. And that's a scary thought.
&gt; Not one, not a single, solitary, rocket of Hezbollah has   &gt; been aimed at a military target If that is the case, how have Hezbollah managed to kill more soldiers than civilians (in contrast with the Israelis)?  Michelle Malkin is an ignorant bigot --- you'd do better with other news sources if you really want to know what's going on.  Then again, given your nick, you probably don't.
The BJAX (Browser Extensions plus AJAX) example widget, polished and working with both Firefox and IE. 
Is any software "unopinionated"?   The Nitro opinion is that you should focus on objects, not relational tables.  The Nitro opinion is to follow YAGNI and not auto-generate a dozen or more files and directories you may not need.  
criminals can be so dumb
Poor Lindsay.. ;-(
It is though. For example, they have universal healthcare.
Stoking the conspiracy theorists--why the hell did they go to all the trouble of inventing such a high-res camera only to not come up with any better way of broadcasting the footage on national television than to point a camera at a video monitor? They knew they wanted to broadcast the landing on television.  WTF? Also, isn't it kind of odd that the original footage is now missing, given, as mangleon here said: "The moon landings were the greatest accomplishment in the history of mankind." The greatest accomplishment in human history, and they can't find the original footage?
Poor Tom - whatever will he do?!?!
Paid for by friends of Ted Stevens.
Those hips definitely don't lie around!
"apt-get is just so unreasonably fucking great" No kidding. You know what else rocks? **cron**. You can schedule stuff to run at random times, and your computer will just, like, do it!
For me too, this was something of a worm in the apple -- and the off-handed way it was thrown in as fact was quite disturbing.
I think if you had a dog you would feel differently about how any dog is treated, whether it belonged to you or not. Or else you are a seriously messed up human being.
Is one of your colleages Matz?   http://blade.nagaokaut.ac.jp/cgi-bin/scat.rb/ruby/ruby-talk/179642 
I catch hell for my sig all the time. It's a sloppy mess, and it never looks the same on paper was it doe on my license because the box they give you to sign at the DMV is way too small for the real world. Hey, if they want to read what it says, they would ask you to print. It's supposed to be hard to forge, not easy to read. :-)
"They train young men to drop fire on people.  But their commanders won't allow them to write fuck on their airplanes because it's obscene!"
I've had to use apt-get before and gentoo's emerge is about a million times better in my opinion.  sure there are some hoops to jump through if you need to use masked packages, but all in all i feel it's a far superior system.  The fact that i don't have to yell and shake my fist at the sky when a program has a dependancy is proof of this.
Er... people who enjoy cooking? People who want to understand how stuff is made? DIYers? I don't get it.  You only make things when you can't afford buying them ready-made? Your life sounds terribly boring, but  to each his own, I guess.
the site itself is kind of funny http://www.killbillsbrowser.com/
You don't really have to repeat things that are already explained in the article.  ("*... it is possible to create a password that cannot be cracked in any reasonable time. /.../ So yes, eventually any password can be cracked, but eventually may not fall in your lifetime. /.../ Of course, advances in computing power may some day make this myth a reality.*")
"The right to receive such revenues shall continue for as long as the NBA or its successors continues in its existence."  The key here is "its successors".... The only way I could see is for a new league to start.. and all the teams to slowly move to that .. leaving the NBA bankrupt .. with no continuing assests.
&gt; And if you need someone to tell you this astounding fact, you're probably beyond help, and it doesn't matter how many times people tell you. The thing is, a hell of a lot of women will read that list, agree with every point, and then do their level best to attract and hold onto *the exact opposite*. Uncaring idiot losers are more attractive to women overall than smart, successful, caring men.  I've seen men change from one to the other and back again and I've seen the response they get from women when they do.  I rarely get in a bad mood when I'm out, but when I do, I *always* pull without even trying, it's like magic. I think that when a woman is looking for a nice guy, they are often just consciously telling themselves that as a response to a string of men who have treated them like shit, and not because they actually want a nice guy.  There's a world of difference between wanting somebody and telling themselves that they *should* want somebody. It's not a pleasant experience to have a woman come onto you when you know that the only reason they are doing it is because they are telling themselves that you are good for them and not because they actually want you. To ward off the usual rebuttals: no, it's not a confidence thing, and no, it's not a doormat thing.  Not in my experience, both as a bloke and as a mate to bastards, nice guys and women.  It's a genuine preference for men they know won't treat them right. You can write a hundred articles like this and no matter how many women agree wholeheartedly, they'll still go for the dickheads.  The cynic in me says that if you want to find a woman, act like a bastard, and the bloody-minded idealist in me says that you are better off without the crazies and you should wait for the rare women who do genuinely want nice guys. 
No they shouldn't, when you enter into a contract with someone, you should honor it.  Assuming that neither party was illegally coerced or misled.  Basicly these guys signed a contract for the longterm and are now reaping the benefits.
You can easily distinguish basketball-dunking "intelligence" from, say, emotional, social, artistic, and other types of intelligence. Without an underlying basis for what intelligence consists in, "g" is a meaningless concept.  This underlying basis is mostly socially construed.  We decided that verbal &amp; mathematical reasoning, etc, are parts of intelligence, and that's how we came up with "g".  It just so happened they correlate well with one another, which is what makes "g" usable at all.  The fact that the correlation exists weakly suggests something about the nature of intelligence, but it in no way gives us reason to reject other types of intelligence merely because they do not correlate with "g". 
It's so true! I almost never say "“Yaw dawg whazzap!!" except in jest!
how about Emmett Brown's dog.  Wasn't he called Einstein.
so fucking right.
I don't think many Muslims listen to him.  :(
Thread was deleted, just like the first time it came up, still the security hole remains unfixed. Kinda sucks.
If he thought apt-get was cool he should've tried aptitude. Not the ncurses interface but just the CLI one, such "sudo aptitude install..." or "sudo aptitude remove...". I absolutely LOVE it.
&gt; What's unreal about Python/Ruby? No native thread support. Inefficient virtual machines. Bad upwards compatibility. Many libraries written by amateurs and unusable in real life, with no alternatives available. Few coders available on the market. False advertising by language proponents.
"...To power and cool the vast number of computers, known as servers, that process data for the Net"  So that is what is processing the data when I type on this input device in front of me, known as a keyboard.
Booster seat industry must have wily lobbyists.
This is the first I've heard of IncreduLisp. Looking at the syntax, I'm forced to assume the author is trying to convert Perl hackers.
News, resources, articles &amp; discussion for the UK business and industrial training community. Features training jobs, training shop, uk training business and training jokes. 
La Mozilla Blog Bar è uno strumento che può risolvere il problema della gestione e lettura dei blog preferiti. Io ne ho non meno di 100 e mi rendo conto che può diventare problematico seguirli tutti e sopratutto organizzarli in gruppi omogenei - questa toolbar ha le funzionalità organizzative per fare questo ed altro ...
heh - good one.
blog cited in a legal opinion?
It would be better if you had gotten the title correct.
ironic that this article would come from PT which has long been in the vanguard of the touchy-feely-risk-averse-hypersensitive-introspective-everything-is-a-mental-illness  movement since the 1970's.
Is this fact or fiction?
"Seldom in history have the name and reputation of a human grouping lost so vast a store of support and sympathy so fast" Except maybe for the US after 9/11.
If you're not afraid to install it yourself, you could always try to locate MSI S260/S270 laptops.  They can be shipped without Windows, and most of the hardware (including wireless) is reasonably linux-friendly.
really?
I have never had a problem with apt-get and dependencies. I am kind of curious what trouble it has given you, as I see dependency resolution as one of the main points of the whole system.
Yeah, everyone knows Steve Jobs personally invented the MP3-player during a circle-jerk session with 14 of his closest husbands, and that there were absolutely no MP3-players before the iPod and no MP3-player will ever be as "OMG GRAET" as the iPod.
Yeah cool my data center baby, pump that water, uh-uh
Screw cron, have you heard about pipes? Evidently you can just send the output from one program into another and you totally don't have to look at it. The whole process even avoids using the tubes that bring internets to your computer, which is good because those damn hippy kids with their music videos make my internets slow enough as it is.
I'll second MSI as a brand, although I have never used their laptops. There desktop systems proved to be brilliant in a number of ways.
Billy Bragg was there? That explains his keen insight: "In the Soviet Union a scientist is blinded / By the resumption of nuclear testing and he is reminded / That Dr Robert Oppenheimer's optimism fell / At the first hurdle" 
See my other post: http://reddit.com/info/brmc/comments/cbso7
&gt; "J0hn99" is not as strong a password as it appears. (...) A better approach is to be less predictable. Rather than replacing "o" with "0", try replacing "o" with two characters such as "()" as in "j()hn". Is this a parody? If, as explained in the article, hackers automatically try common substitutions, like 0 for o, can't they just as easily add a rule that substitutes () for o. ROFL on that one. A useful tip, IMO, is to look at [Diceware](http://world.std.com/~reinhold/diceware.html). Basically, you create a password by concatenating plain words, randomly selected from a list of 8000. The results are rather long (which is a disadvantage if you have to type them often), but are easy to remember and offer a _predictable_ level of security. (As in, even if an attacker knows your way of generating passwords, he has to try 2^37 combinations on average to break a three-word diceware password, which may be or may not be enough for your application. Long passwords are obviously exponentially harder.)
I am guessing it was a hardware problem. If he was running windows on it then it must be one of the new macs. Pretty much a first generation anything in the computer world has at least one nasty bug.
A few months I was locked out of my hotel room with no ID so I suggested to the hotel clerk that I could give him my info (birthdate, address, email address, etc.) to prove I am who I say I am. He told me the only accepted way to get a key would be to compare my signature to the one I gave when I checked in. It was the first and only time I've needed my signature checked, and it took me three attempts before he decided it matched. My signature is inconsistent, but I also find it funny because it's not like this hotel clerk is an expert in handwriting. If part of my job was trying to compare signatures I'd surely have a tough time.
This is all totally true, I'm living proof. 1. Of course, I called you when I said I would.  It's in my PDA which I synced to Evolution and the uploaded to my Google Calendar.  Duh!  (And you phone number I saved in full international dialing format starting with +1 in case I need to call you from Bolivia) 2. You hand over all your hardware to me and everything's going to be AOK.  Just don't start asking me why we need more equipment, we do.   That's the way it is.  You want your iTMS account all set up and linked to your CC, ok, but I get to install WiMax in the toilet. 3. I'm all romance, baby.  I've seen every Austin Powers movie and I know all the moves.  Oh, yeah!   And check this out I've integrated our music system into an AIM bot I just wrote (love_buddy_1970).  Just one instant message of 'inthemood' and the lights dim, Burt Bacharach oozes from the speakers and the Mountain Dew's on ice. 4. This is true, but I am superior to all the others because of my wide grasp of programming languages, and doctorate from excellent your-mother-pleasing university. 5. See #5 6. I do not remember dates, dammit.  See #1.  But please, next time, recall that I use only zulu time and when I said I would meet you at 0300Z you should have been able to translate that to 4pm. 7. Yes, I am a great lover.   20 years of kegel exercises, imagination and #5 what do you expect?  References available upon request. 8. Did I also mention that I consider last night's (or the night before's) cold pizza to be a breakfast food as well?    9. I tend to use the terminology 'pipe' instead of 'bar' because of its UNIX connotation.  And Victoria's Secret models?  Why would I look at that when there are Suicide Girls? 10. If you come home and I'm slumped across the keyboard, the very least you can do is CTRL-X CTRL-S whatever I'm working on.  THEN, put the blanket over my shoulders. 11. The likelihood of me inviting my friends around to actually see you if epsilon for small values of epsilon.  All my friends are on line, none of them live within 500kms of me, and I don't even want to know what they look like.  Would that have been more romantic if I'd said 'I only have eyes for you'? 12. You don't get it.  We want you to walk around bra-less in a ratty t-shirt.  It's not that we're not possessive, it's that that looks hot!   And those extra pounds?  Just like Spinal Tap say... the deeper the cushion the sweeter the pushin' 13. See #5.  I realize that intelligence and education are not necessarily correlated, but you could at least have merged #13 and #5 together saving valuable space. 14. If I say "Yaw wazzup dawg" I will die of shame. 15. Yes, I do, whoever you are.  Feel free to contact me on IRC.  I know you're the one. 
What I find baffling about this story is that the real age of the identity thief is given as 23.  Why was she using someone else's card to get into a bar?
He was running Word, but not necessarily Windows.
Everyone knows that UNIX is a series of pipes. 
I find it interesting that people who have never had religious experiences mock religion. For those skeptics who are afraid to try or lack the capacity, you can read about the measurable neurobiological effects in "Why God Won't Go Away" by Andrew Newberg,Eugene G. D'Aquili.
Can a Business Rule Engine do everything that a computer can do, i.e. is it Turing Complete? And what does this have to do with First Order Logic? 
what strikes me is the woman trying to prove she was 21 was actually 23.
Are these folks now running Geek Squad? ROFLWAFL!
Yea it is amazing isn't it?  I heard this on the radio on the way into work.  This is my favorite part: &gt;'The odds of this waitress recovering her own license defy calculation,' police Capt. Guy Turner said Monday.
I like how she refers to D&amp;D as DnD.
As one who grew up in Michigan but has lived in California for more than  half his life, I laughed out loud at this map. I grew up calling soft drinks "pop" but began calling them soda when I moved to California in my mid-twenties. Another mid-west colloquialism: calling corner liquor stores "party stores"? In Michigan they were called party stores.  After moving to California in 1976 I quickly figured out that not only did people not know what I was talking about when I said "party store," but that the terminology even seemed to make them a bit uncomfortable. So I quit saying party store until, after I'd been here nearly thirty years, I was scanning the online edition of the Detroit Free Press.  There it was -- a reference to a "party store" robbery!
&gt;"The second is a desperately tricky thing to express. I steer clear because I have too many friends who are Jews whose feelings I don’t want to hurt." He goes on with the statement that he feels only Jews can speak negatively about Israel.  This reminds me of a Seinfeld episode where a guy converted just to tell Jewish jokes.  Matthew Parris: you are not worthy to write about Israel.  You are also not worthy to write articles.  You are inferior to everyone around you.  I'm glad you know your place in the world is at the bottom and that you are willing to sacrifice your freedom of speech, no matter how passionate you feel about something, in order to protect those who are your superiors.  My advice to you: get friends with thicker skins.
Looks serious to me.  The existence of right-wing web designers shouldn't come to a surprise to anyone.
How do you know they never had religious experiences?
This is really depressing...
[Birds of Britain](http://reddit.com/info/a0yd/comments).  I thought this was incredibly hilarious, but maybe my title sucked.  And it might be older than I am, so maybe I'm the last to see it. 
What I'm curious about is if anyone knows where this really came from. Here is the public whois information:    \tRegistrant: JACKSON, CHAD  \t13510 Lakewood Meadow Drive  \tCypress, TX 77429  \tUS \t   \tDomain Name: PRAYFORGEORGEWBUSH.COM  \tAdministrative Contact : \t   \tJACKSON, CHAD  \tchad.jackson@sbcglobal.net  \t13510 Lakewood Meadow Drive  \tCypress, TX 77429  \tUS  \tPhone: 281-376-3093  \tFax: 281-890-9905 (Note that this is the public whois record, so I'm not dangling anyone's personal info here that can't be obtained with a simple whois command.) Googling the name gives too many results to find anything useful. 
I find this quite amusing as a waitress and a former bartender. Ladybear
Meet new Google Labs creation - Google Page Creator with AdSense
Apparently we are a nation of whiners, and top-10 list generators, and unsolicited advice-givers (and invaders and occupiers).
It's not just right wing. It's explicitly theocratic-fascist. Note the opening paragraph.
Proposes crash program to develop midriff-extraction technology
&gt;&gt; With LM, password hashes were split into two separate 7-character hashes. &gt; They did WHAT??? Yeah, pretty freaking stupid move there, eh? Admittedly at the time Microsoft was just starting to figure out networking so the mistake could be excused, if it hadn't been preserved in the name of backwards compatability until very recently. &gt; Even better, one night, after everyone's gone home, go through the offices pulling post it notes off the underside of all the keyboards (or other favourite hiding places), and when people ask for a password change in the morning, remind them not to write their password down :) They will still write it down, it just will end up in the wallet/purse instead of under the keyboard.
Shitney Spears
I think you mean *spiritual* experiences.  Spiritual experiences only become religious experiences when a certain dogma is attached to them either subconsciously or after the fact as an explanation of sorts.  Although I can’t speak for this author, I certainly have no problem with either spiritual or religious experience.  I’ve had varying degrees of both over the years. But these are the most personal of personal experiences. I do have a problem with people using them as some kind of *proof* or *validation* for dogmas that they then publicize, evangelize, and in doing so, devalue. Illogic is fine and even healthy sometimes, but keep it to yourself.  
The story's author had enough religious experiences.  He's a self-described "mystic atheist"; according to him, [God himself told to him that he doesn't exist](http://www.jhuger.com/mystic_atheism).  Seriously. Try knowing people before judging them.
Yale's too liberal. Duke, perhaps? But Jesus could be an Eli (he was Jewish, afterall).
I've read that article before. In the last paragraph they explain that you cannot assemble a cheap PC better than Dell. However, they make money on these expensive systems, like the one you mentioned above.  I would never spend that much on a home PC, it's crazy.
come on! Its a bit of fun. You geeks just take things too seriously
A cult is a cult is a cult.  just because a cult has gained power, even over entire states (eg israel, syria) and convinced people to call them a 'religion' does not change what they are.   jews, christians, muslims, (etc, etc.):  these are simply cults with power (ken wilber readers are welcome to substitute "pathological dominance hierarchy" for "cult" in this discussion if you wish, but i'm just picking on the cults today). even the best representatives of these cults are constantly pushing the idea that "we are right and everyone else is wrong". this is clearly THE (or at least a major) basis of racism, nationalism, anthropocentrism and the rest of the nasty little 'isms' that drive us to kill each other and to make up foul, small-minded excuses for why it is just fine to kill someone because they are (fill in the blank). Note: if you haven't noticed, all the cults i'm discussing here like to claim that little "thou shall not kill" joke for themselves (of course! they all share the same cult guide, aka "1st testament" in christian terms).   But you must admit it is funny how they all kill so happily: they seem to enjoy killing members of other cults more than their own, but they all find reasons to kill their own cult members as well, which seems a bit odd - if highly entertaining - to me. I thought for a while the christian cult that seems to be running the usa at the moment was being smart by getting the two major sects of the islamic cult (shia, sunni) to fight each other in iraq.  after all, they usually get along at least as well as, say, the catholic and the protestant sects of the christian cult, which is to say not too well in some places, but generally avoiding all-out war But since the christian cult/usa seems to have decided to prop up the jewish cult state at a particularly stupid moment, the al-qaeda sect of the sunnis may be willing to help out the hezbollah sect of the shias (shiites), on the "enemy of my enemy is my friend" theory, i guess, which may eventually get the two cults together enough to attack the unfortunate representatives (aka us soldiers) of the christian cult in iraq.  lousy tactics, methinks, but then, one can't expect rational choices from cultists...  plus it appears that jewish cultists are allied with christian cultists in us power circles, so we should have expected that here's hoping that i have irritated all the cult members out there who like to pretend that their cult is better than everyone else's cult (wow, that's a lot of you!) or those who wish to pretend that their culture hasn't been hijacked by cults...  is that everyone?  i apologize if i somehow failed to insult anyone. (hint for less-than-alert readers: what is the 1st syllable of culture?) 
extremely well put, I couldn't possibly agree more.
pretty good tips.  I can see trying them out although that toughest part will be maintaining patience.  especially when I am rarely able to get a thought in with my boss
For some reason, I'm reminded of the following exchange: &gt;General Jack D. Ripper: Well, I, uh... I... I... first became aware of it, Mandrake, during the physical act of love. &gt;Group Capt. Lionel Mandrake: Hmm. &gt;General Jack D. Ripper: Yes, a uh, a profound sense of fatigue... a feeling of emptiness followed. Luckily I... I was able to interpret these feelings correctly. Loss of essence. &gt;Group Capt. Lionel Mandrake: Hmm. &gt;General Jack D. Ripper: I can assure you it has not recurred, Mandrake. Women uh... women sense my power and they seek the life essence. I, uh... I do not avoid women, Mandrake. &gt;Group Capt. Lionel Mandrake: No. &gt;General Jack D. Ripper: But I... I do deny them my essence.
Exactly--I dont' care what scripture or book you quote, I don't consider Bush "the man whom God has placed in the office of the Presidency." That said, non-theocrats should see this.
&gt;It's explicitly theocratic-fascist. Well, not necessarily. I mean, the Bible quote implies that--for instance--Clinton was also placed into office by their god's will. Of course, that's assuming logical consistency, which might be a bit much to hope for. And there's the point that... well, the real hard core theocratic-fascists think the [Rebublican government is too liberal](http://worldnetdaily.com/news/article.asp?ARTICLE_ID=38571).  I should have said "right-wing *Christian* web designers" though!
A reporter traces a tank of gasoline from its sale in America back to its origins in the Middle East, Africa, and South America.
45212176. So, what is the asterisk for? 
That's exactly how 99% of religions out there work.
&gt; they should be similarly responsible for backdoors in the security systems Wait, why? It doesn't make much *business* sense for a security systems vendor. They are just using this snakeoil security as a marketing tactic. As far as I know, saying that something is "secure" does not automatically make one liable for the system being broken. Neither does it being broken directly kill people, indirectly even, unlike safety problems. The only real problem here is those damn insurance companies.
Being a waitress in Las Vegas,dealing with people from everywhere, the most asked for in the question of pop or soda, is soda hands down, unless they ask for as specific such as 7-up or DP.
Old school Bostonians say tonic, although soda is the most common term in the region, as the map indicates. Moxie is the state drink of Maine.
I'm about to expose some ignorance... Isn't it a problem that space is also (almost) a vacuum. How does a body shed heat in a vacuum? Doesn't it act as an insulator?
Why not sue them? A monthly paycheck is not a small amount.
Even if the cat is dead?
Those racks are *far* more neat and tidy than any i've seen in real life.
Everybody knows it's pop.
You all realize that article is over 4 years old right?
yah.. this is beyond depressing...
screw that
I'm sure they're non functional mockups of old outdated machines that the tech guys gave the marketing department to show off.
&gt;You are taking the statements of one soldier and qualifying that as an example of a organizational mindset. If there is anyone with a case of myopia it is you. Excuse me?  I don't believe I posted anything to the effect that this soldier's behavior can be generalized to the armed forces as a whole.  Don't try to tell me what I think. The point that I actually was making is that it's pretty self-serving and inane to suppose that *this particular* soldier was being clever and cynically feeding the reporter what he wanted to hear (which couldn't have been that clever, since the reporter didn't even report it until it came out that this guys was a rapist and murderer) rather than just being his emotionally and mentally fucked up, violent, crazy self. And BTW, making apologies for the behavior of someone who rapes a 14 year old and then murders her and her family doesn't create a whole lot of sympathy for your perspective.
I just heard that my (major?) southern university (Rice) has announced plans to make an offsite campus and increase enrollment by 30% over the next 5 years.  WTF?  It used to be this great little gem, and now they're going bonkers with expansion -- and dilution.  :(
You'll notice the guy is from Wilkes-Barre which is the new hot bed of republican activity as they try to sway this traditionally blue state, red. The idea here is to split the Dem vote in key PA voting ditricts so that Santorum can eak out the same way Bush did in 2000. Essentially it means Santorum's people get to run two candidates, to the Dem's one. Smart strategizing. Cynical politics. We'll see if this works the 2nd time around. How can this be possible? Dems have not in recent historyembraced their fringe, unlike repubs who keep their fringers in the tent to preven exactly this type of undermining.
Heh... obviously satire but hilarious... 
The referenced article is a classic.
&gt; Uncaring idiot losers are more attractive to women overall than smart, successful, caring men. true. And if you need someone to tell you **this** astounding fact, you're probably beyond help, and it doesn't matter how many times people tell you.
It works on skin, but that might be because of the excessive dryness and low pressure rather than the temperature. Anyway, it's a non issue because as long as we're going to eject it into space, might as well send it toward the sun and let nature take its course.
A cult is a cult is a cult.  Which cult is arming this cult?  And which cult member is against a cease-fire?  (hint: President Bush dismissed calls for what he described as "stopping for the sake of stopping.”... )
A cult is a cult is a cult.
He didn't kill the girl he had raped and her family from a fighter jet or helicopter -- he did it with a gun.  To me there's a difference between someone who can stare someone in the eyes, point a gun at them, and pull the trigger, and someone who works for the marketing department at Pringles.  But whatever.
Hilary Alexander on Marni, Givenchy, Bella Freud, London Fashion week
Hilary Alexander on Marni, Givenchy, Bella Freud, London Fashion week
It just seems sad to me that we stopped research on nuclear power in favor of coal, hydro and natural gas.  From everything I've read nuclear is by far the lesser of the evils.
Anger leads to flamage. Flamage leads to downmods. Downmods lead to suffering.  Much to learn you have.
&gt; Is this a satire of apt-get? He lists quite a few things that didn't work due to it. No he doesn't, try reading it again.  He lists good and bad points about Ubuntu.  apt-get is simply one of the good points.  The bad points are unrelated to apt-get, they are just bad points about Ubuntu in general.  Or do you really think that Thunderbird not seeing an IMAP folder is something to do with the way that it is packaged? 
&gt; "The bread literally changes into the body of Jesus. Not   &gt; figuratively. But literally. What's that you ask? Well no,   &gt; of course it didn't turn into human flesh. And of course   &gt; it's still bread. But it's literally changed! Meh, don't be a dope.  It's based on the Thomist reading of Aristotle, which distinguishes between essence and accidents. That's Catholicism -- transubstantiation.  Lutheranism believes in 'consubstantiation', and Calvinism in the 'figurative' transformation.  There is no 'Christian' theology---just many competing theologies, heresies, schisms and disagreements.
These fundies are ridiculously well-organized and very much online.  I've always found it curious that American high technology can co-exist with medieval superstition.  Scary stuff.
Did you bother reading the article?  The whole point is that people are using the "avoid premature optimization" mantra to either be lazy or hide their incompetence. The example I provided was a real situation I encountered that matched his observations, demonstrating they are not bogus. 
&gt; Startling numbers of Christians don't bother to provide any   &gt; reasoning other than a bald-faced assertion s/Startling numbers/all/ If you are startled, then you have missed the point about religion.
Mike means we've milked this mess to the max.
&gt;“I get so frustrated if I get the timing wrong and the egg is too hard to dip my toasted soldiers in. My design solves this problem.” Toasted soldiers???
emerge -&gt; from source -&gt; slow to install / fast to get updates  apt -&gt; from binary -&gt; fast to install /slow to get updates (yes, you can use surce with apt, and binary with portage, but...)
I think you mean 'canonical.'  Even then you're wrong.  It is not meaningful to attribute fallability to an inanimate object.
Translation:  Uncaring idiot losers = "guys with hot girls who are not me" dickheads = "guys with hot girls who are not me"  .... In my experience, most men who complain about the "nice guy" problem are NOT actually nice.  They are creepy &amp; they think you owe them a sexual relationship because they watered your plants &amp; drove you to the airport once.  Or they're recently dumped and full of hate.  Or they try to date women who are clearly out of their league. The bastards out there are least honest about their motivations, and honesty goes a long way.
Video version of this story: http://reddit.com/info/bvs0/comments
The [reason he got banned](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/User_talk:Stephencolbert) (well, supposedly him…): &gt; At Wikipedia, we appreciate your interest in the project, but your username matches a well-known public personality and has been blocked. To protect against impersonation, please provide confirmation of your identity to regain access to this account. User:Tawker has sent an emailed request and left a voicemail with the Colbert staff requesting confirmation, let him know and this account can be re-opened. His request was sent from tawker@hotmail.com, and he is our point of contact for this issue. This is being done to protect the actual Stephen Colbert from impersonation. If you are not him, then please review the Wikpedia username policy to pick another handle. Thanks for your patience! - CHAIRBOY (☎) and the rest of the WP admin staff. 05:38, 1 August 2006 (UTC)
&gt; Thunderbird not seeing an IMAP folder is something to do with the way that it is packaged? Every single one of the other problems *should* have been fixed by the packaging though. This is why allowing the users to add arbitrary patches to any package (ala ebuilds) is better than relying on the original developers to package their application and get it  working on every platform imaginable (apt-get,rpm..). This especially decreases the problems in the interaction *between* different packages -- just what he experienced.
http://reddit.com/goto?id=8dnl I like Chaser's satire, but seems Redditors don't. I thought this perfectly captured the vacuousness of the Miss World thing.
Go cultists!  Kill for peace!!!  Yay WW3!!!!!
The Greek gods are said to have done little else.
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!!
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!!
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!!
Actually, no, it can't work.  If we boycott Israeli products than Israel will just be given more of your tax dollars to shore up the loses.  Every year billions in foreign aid is given to Israel and they can always request more.  So the only way to fully boycott Israel would be to boycott their products AND not pay your federal taxes.  But that will just land you in jail.  Nice system they got huh?
So here's the story, posted copied from a friend at www.gloryofwar.com So apparently in Budapest, the government has put up a public internet-based vote to see what they should name some new bridge. The vote is open to anyone, there's no registration required, and you can even nominate your own entries. As a result, there are literally HUNDREDS of possible choices now. God bless the internet, lol. Anyway, despite all this chaos, who's leading the pack, with over 9500 votes and 12% of the total ballots? That's right - CHUCK NORRIS. Dizzamn! He absolutely has to win this. Some day, many years from now, I want to visit Hungary and drive over the Chuck Norris bridge and laugh hysterically. Here's the link to the voting list - just search the page for Chuck, click his radio button and then find the vote button at the bottom of the page. It's all in Hungarian, but fairly easy to figure out. Do it now!
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!!
I had various dependency issues in previous versions of Ubuntu, but thus far on 6.06 it's been smooth sailing, which has been nice. My main problem now is hardware vendor support for linux...unfortunately vmware can only see devices already recognized by ubuntu.
Yea it seems like a pretty good idea.  It'd be really great if they continued it on down through Mexico to south America too.  I'm not a big fan of driving in Mexico since their roads are a little sketchy.  I could see this really picking up trade.  Having decent rail along side it is also a really good idea.
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!!  (if you think christians or muslims or jews are civilized human beings, put down the kool-aid and back away from the cult)
Oops, my mouse went berzerk and I accidentally deleted my comment. It was something about how we're all in for a future of natto and marmite (hence pica's reply).
I kind of liked it. True, many of the points have been made before, but not in the same way. Most of the stuff about ms vs google have been floating around, but not the comparison to napolean :)
Comparing apt-get and emerge is like comparing apples and oranges. Apt-get is more convenient to use ( no long compile times ) and Emerge gives you more flexibility.
I don't see why anyone should hate you for that. Just please keep in mind that IDE+library support will only get you so far. For programs that involve patching together a large set of existing components having a good library is probably better than just about anything else. Most software can be characterized this way. When your program code is mostly concerned with building on itself the libraries become less important. Keep that in mind when deciding how to handle new projects and decide appropriately. I cannot think of a situation in which a bad IDE is better than a good one.
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!! (there are no innocents in cults.  jews == christians == muslims == ignorant intolerant cults)
Maybe she was planning on using her stolen credit card to pay for drinks.
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!! (if you think christians or muslims or jews are civilized human beings, put down the kool-aid and back away from the cult)
So his theory is that after having Israelis drop American bombs on them, Lebanese civilians will be angry at Hezbollah?
Go cultists! Kill for peace!!! Yay WW3!!!!! (if you think christians or muslims or jews are civilized human beings, put down the kool-aid and back away from the cult)
gee that was suckily told.
Interesting idea, but I prefer the tiny lamps that you stick in the ground on the side of the paths.
From the article: &gt;"The result contradicts our basic concepts of cosmology, and we are struggling to explain it," said Jason X. Prochaska, associate professor of astronomy and astrophysics at the University of California, Santa Cruz.  &gt;"A lot of people have been scratching their heads, and most hope that it goes away," Prochaska said. "The GRB sample is small, so we would like to triple or quadruple the number in our analysis. That should happen during Swift's extended mission, but it will take time."  &gt;.. so far the findings remain perplexing.
I am not from the *technology* field and not even int the US so I had to find who the hell Tim Bray is. Checking that I must admit that I was surpised that a person who intends to write technology-related *essays* should know (or at have some knowledge) about different operating systems and their main characteristics.
Yeah one of the three Senators that he needs for a cloture vote is none other than Joe Lieberman. Yeah that Joe Lieberman  who is in a primary challenge in CT, Aug 8. This is actually a key reason why the blog/tech world is trying to oust him, it should be a no brainer for a progressive candidate from either party to back Net Neutrality and block the Stevens bill, but Joe is way out in right field here. If Joe was smart he would get involved in the cloture process and then dramatically kill with lots of cameras around to show that he is a Net Neutrality hero, which would steal some wind from Lamont's sails. But see even that smart move can't be counted on, so people interested in Net Neutrality need to work the phones to keep this thing from crawling back from the dead to bite the whole Internet in the tuckus.
I thought it was sweet, and I could certainly use it as encouragement, feeling a bit low lately.
That isn't true; when you're drunk, you know you're drunk.  The danger isn't in the chemical changing your perception; the danger is in being an arrogant fool by nature, and consciously *choosing* to put faith in your abilities, despite knowing full well that they are compromised.  By the time you are too drunk to understand that you are unfit to drive, you'll most likely be too paralytic to even attempt it. LSD, on the other hand, can change an otherwise reasonable person into a complete fucking lunatic, without compromising their abilities to move around and engage in some normal tasks.  They become, essentially, a different person. The two are really not comparable.
&gt;The energy efficiency of a server “is an important consideration”, says Dawn Sawyer, operations manager at GuideStone Financial Resources, of the Southern Baptist Convention in Dallas. “It is not the main consideration, though. Our main consideration on servers is processor speed. That’s going to trump the energy efficiency of a server,” she says. But isn't there some kind of trade-off involved? What if one server is 15% faster than another, but uses twice as much energy?  Isn't electricity a significant cost in datacenters?
I worked in retail for several years during college and you wouldn't believe some of the things people would sign - especially at the self checkout registers.  We would check the receipts at the end of the night and the signatures would range from "f*ck you" to artistically drawn smilies...
This is an Urban Legend so old that pre-dates elevators invention.
wow, a Duh Magazine cover story... I could have sworn the Interwebs was run out of Bill Gates' closet.  Silly me. 
Juan Cole is a longstanding commentator and historian of Shi'a politics.  Another solid article.
Modded down?  I guess people didn't get the reference... (Colonel Kurtz, Apocalypse Now!)
Sofa != couch? Seriously, what's the difference?
Or, more likely, they are newly-installed systems that haven't been re-worked a dozen times.
omg! what kind of religion do you have over there? :p
They won awards for customer service, but that was years ago when they were smaller and they actually HAD customer service. I build my own, but I did buy my last laptop from Dell.  I will buy my next laptop from someone else. 
Heh, I had to research to see if you were serious, and eventually found this: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vigeland_Park 
Really? I've almost never experienced this. My mother is a vegetarian and my father is not and I'm some sort of half-breed as I don't eat any red meats (Just found this is covered by the term pollo-vegetarian). When I tell people that I don't eat red meat I will often be asked why, but not in any rude kind of way. I respond with "because that's how I was raised" or "because I feel it's healthier" and that pretty much is all I hear about it.
doing a bit more homework reveals the [edits by the user "stephencolbert"](http://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Special:Contributions&amp;target=Stephencolbert)
I thought the best way was the following: 1) Receive "top percentile / five star" merit increase. Raise is less than inflation.  2) Quit job.  3) Get new job.  Signing bonus greater than last merit increase.  4) Do a great job.  Boss calls you in office to talk about your stellar performance and merit increase.  5) Repeat.
Good article. Bad headline. Reddit headlines acts as a mini-summary for article. In this case while reflecting the title headline actually implies the opposite of the article content which is not apparent without reading the story.
Maybe the 23-year old didn't have a legitimate ID of their own?  Or as was suggested, intended to use the credit card that came with the stolen ID.
Forget lisp. Don't you know that the language with the most true power is **assembly**? You can just roll in your own compiler while your at it! Readability, maintainability, ease of coding, library support -- who cares! 
An underappreciated effect of climate change.
All 3 of them? We have a crisis on our hands.
template methods: the original IOC container.  doubt me?  consult the GOF's section on the template pattern.  don't have a copy of GOF's "Design Patterns"?  then shut your trap.
though you'd think the waitress would have canceled her credit card by then..
foreign language tutoring - phoenix, az
Unless you have an open source base, from OS on up, which has cryptographic signatures in all components so that all components can instantly be proven to be tamper free and running correctly.  MIT and Stanford had a mock of such a system at one point in the course of their post 2000 vote machine study. Right now its in the interest of incumbents in both parties to prevent a transparent voting system from ever emerging. Each party misuses the voting in their own strong holds. Republicans have become more aggressive and effective with this tampering, especially via mail in ballots and voter registration roll purges, than Dems in recent times. But both sides have a long history of nastiness.
phatalbert, a lot of people on reddit (you and him included apparently) seem to hold an unconscious assumption (a delusion, really) that reality is dependant on the arguments of anonymous strangers. It is not.  And acting like a prissy little ass is, unsurprisingly not proof that your opponent is a teenager like you, living in his mom's basement...  But all of this has noticably escaped you.  Fret not.  You too will grow up day.
i went there and read her profile at http://youtube.com/profile?user=ailecec  if its the truth she just turned 10 when she played it which means she had 2 1/2 years experience playing piano.  i don't know alot about this music but it looks decent for 2 1/2 years experience.
I think the amount of time spent playing video games is more disturbing than the content of them.  What happened to playing outside?
yeah, right. Writely and Flickr are _so_ much more important to me than Firefox, Eclipse, and Python.
That might be your experience, but it certainly isn't mine.  Your "translation" (let's be honest: speculation about somebody you don't even know) is *way* off.  The nice guys I know are genuinely nice, and the dickheads I describe as such because they constantly lie, cheat and generally mistreat people, not because I envy them. &gt; The bastards out there are least honest about their motivations To other guys, yes, but not to women. 
Agreed.  My stolen credit card number was used to pay a phone bill.
The whole time i was reading that i was waiting for him to say what google's bandwidth bills are. What a let down.
too true :'(
That sad part is, I was completely unaware (or just didn't care and forgot) about Yahoo! Video.
I'm assuming your feeling defensive because you saw much of your upbringing in the article.  Your complete lack of comprehension of the theme and message of the article strenghtens its argument.
Zidane's headbutt song with video. Currently atop the French charts.
I was reloading Recent Changes on Wikipedia during the broadcast, watching the elephant pages get altered; and the amazing thing was how smoothly Wikipedia handled it. The vandalism was reverted and the pages got locked; it looked like just another day on Wikipedia! And "wikiality" http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wikiality (great word!!) was set up as a redirect to the page on The Colbert Report. What a simple, smart solution.
Right, forgot about the Mac port of Office. That said I still think it is a hardware failure.
"But it may not fly in tradition-laced Massachusetts, where such projects have been hard sells." You can say that again. People here are insanely tradtional as well as provincal.
&gt; Every single one of the other problems should have been fixed by the packaging though. By the *packagers*, which has nothing to do with apt-get. &gt; This is why allowing the users to add arbitrary patches to any package (ala ebuilds) is better than relying on the original developers to package their application and get it working on every platform imaginable (apt-get,rpm..). What do you mean?  Ubuntu's packaging system can apply distribution-specific patches just as easily as portage.
And yet you can take your toddler on the bus in your arms, no problem. The same buses have a commemorative plaque honoring Rosa Parks next to a sign that segregates the elderly &amp; handicapped from everyone else.
No, no, no, that's the *intarnet*, stoopid!
&gt; (if you think christians or muslims or jews are civilized human beings, put down the kool-aid and back away from the cult) What does religion have to do with this? There are civilized countries in the world. Israel is not one of them.
This list of 20 can pretty much be distilled into 1: Eat shit and smile, all while telling yourself that the promotion you're angling for is worth feeling your soul die inside you.
David Blair on entreprenuerial spirit in Nairobi
Amazing!  They create propaganda almost as fast as the christian and jewish cults!   BTW, notice the propaganda cleverly inserted into the article, like how the jewish cult 'accidentally' killed civilians, as opposed (implied) to how the shia cult deliberately killed civilians? Or the implied propaganda of the word 'terrorist', which is always applied to those fighting against (fill in name of your favorite cult/government/other grouping of idiots). Even the detestable Ronnie Rayguns understood that one man's terrorist is another man's freedom fighter.   Check back with the adults when you figure out that israel and the us are terrorists just like hezbollah.  having state support makes you a terrorist state, not the 'side of freedom'... Clueless cultists...
&gt; The revolution will not be verified Great quote
Really? I thought it was supposed to be healthier as well. I buy organic milk (after seeing The Corporation) and I've also noticed the expiration date is much much later. Any idea why?
Riiight.  I can't speculate about someone I don't know, but you can make sweeping generalizations about half of the population.  Ok.
I find the way you take it upon yourself to declare what experiences other people have had a clear sign that you're full of yourself.
I have heard from someone who has datacenter experience that at the time they always preferred racks of AMD's to racks of Intels because they gave off less heat.
Les Misérables reference! I loved that Book!  Thanks, you've made my day.
. . . and compulsive commenters, too.  I find myself frustrated nowadays when I read an article, and can't immediately post a comment.  (Especially if I though the article crap.)
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Elephants http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/African_elephant http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oregon http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stephen_Colbert_%28character%29 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Truthiness all locked :)
The building where I work has Otis elevators.  This doesn't work on those.
He inadvertently explains the fatal flaw of democracy -- that a majority of people voting for something does not make it good or right.
Even David Horowitz thinks Israel is losing. See http://frontpagemag.com/Articles/ReadArticle.asp?ID=23602
tiens! un français! Bienvenue sur reddit! Par contre, la tu vas te faire moinser grave, c'est pas bien vu le français ici...
This dude has a typical slave thinking. Especially this: "I will be in the office before my boss' boss 90% of the time. I will leave the office after my boss 100% of the time.". Yea, go ahead, live in the office. Fuck life.
How did I know "Former President" would be Jimmy "Olympic Boycott" Carter?! So if we goto pre-1967 borders, then everyone suddenly will love each other?! If it was that easy why didn't you do it when you were president?
Ooohh... a straw man... Look, nobody is arguing that Saddam was just great. Us nasty baby-eating liberals just don't think that it was in our national interest to spend ourselves into oblivion to attack him given that so many others pose a far greater risk to our country than Saddam did.  We also don't think that the loss of life was worth it, or that the (predictable) downhill direction toward civil war and possible theocracy Iraq has taken is making anything any better. So what do you think? Do you *really* think that America should take it upon itself to overthrow every two-bit dictator in the world and replace them with a rebuilt democracy?  Do you *really* want to foot the bill for that?  Do you *really* think that would actually work? If you do, I happen to think you're a delusional fool with no grasp of history. The Marshall Plan is not an appropriate analogy. Europe already had a democratic tradition to draw upon and already had the expertise to help rebuild itself.  Most of the world's two-bit dictatorships are intellectually stuck in the middle ages, have illiterate populations, and have never experienced freedom. ... and yes, those things *can* be torture. The line between tough interrogation and torture is a fuzzy one, I agree, but some of the things I've heard described from places like Gitmo do indeed sound like torture. The fact that the T word is even part of the national debate is embarrassing. 
But does it run Windows?
I've been saying [for a while now](http://reddit.com/info/at2f/comments/cau38) that the Dems need to do this to the Republicans. If the Pub's are going to play dirty, they can't compete unless they do the same.
I'm a little curious about NZ being ranked #1, since my friends that live there complain of extremely high taxes and regulation, even going to far as to say that any Kiwis who really want to get into business move to Australia, Britain or the US.
Yes, I expect to get some war stories and pointers about what to expect (good and bad).  Was that not clear somehow?
But, still nowhere near as popular as Perl: http://www.google.com/trends?q=steven+colbert%2C+perl
There might be too many submissions on reddit. Submitting stories is a good  thing, since it keeps the website alive, but too much is too much: when I last  looked, the average story stayed only 9 minutes on the new (rising) page. That  means the story has only 9 minutes to find readers before it is burried in the  depths of the not-so-new pages. A solution to this problem could be a slightly higher karma cost to submitting  stories, maybe a fixed fee of 5 karma points? Any better ideas? 
That's pretty bogus that they let a former man compete as a woman.
Fundamentally, the version of Judaism practiced by Zionist is no different that the version of Islam  advocated by the Al Queda.  It is interesting to see the parallels.   A mentor of Bin Ladin and Al Queda movement is the Sayyid Qutb, (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Qutbi)  which has the same ideology as the Rabbinical council. They share the common values in their dark views of the world.  Qutb goes one step further than the Council and says that even Muslims that are not actively working on establishing his dark vision can be killed.   If the parallels hold then Rabbinical council would soon issue a new decree condemning the Jews that are not actively participating in Zionist vision (by seeking peace with Arabs) and declare them as enemies also. What is amazing is that even though everything US stands for and its interest are 180 degrees oppose to these dark visions,  nevertheless, the fundamentalist groups are at one point a close alley of the US, and eventually turn against US.
I only say it on accident. "Yeah, I was stepping through the adaptive resonance function to find out why items from the linked list were vanishing into deep space when YAW DAWG, WHAZZAP!!... sorry... tourettes..."
We do not! How DARE you say that! Don't make me downmod you, you light-hearted bastard!
Um, yeah.  So I am going to digitally mess with my airline ticket instead of just checking in online 24 hours in advance. Don't think so.
But he's seen it with his own eyes, and so have I. I've lost count of how many times I've heard, "I can't believe I dated such a jerk! Ooo! Look! A brand new jerk! I must date him!" (paraphrased).
all I know is that women FEEL attraction so what they SAY has no bearing at all in reality as to what they WANT, which is based on FEELING. as opposed to men, who pretty much all want the same thing all time anyway they can get it no matter what they say . . . in conclusion, very few women actally want anyone NICE. NICE is the worst complement you can get a guy
In theory, the site's userbase should be growing *also*, but I expect that the increasing movement on the Hot page is meaning that even fewer patrol the New page. One alternative might be to render a sidebar on the Hot page, with randomly chosen "risers" in it...
Inadvertently?  I think very few things on his show are done or said by accident, after all he is doing satire and it has to be worded just right.
Uh... I think you two are saying the same thing.
Mmmmm.  [High Fructose Corn Syrup](http://www.google.com/search?q=High+Fructose+Corn+Syrup)!!
Yeah, it's a Southern thing.  Coke is from Atlanta, and I think that for a long time, soda = Coke.  That's what my parents call it.  Hicks.
Perhaps it'd be easier to decide who is winning if we had a simpler model for what "winning" means that is less open to cult manipulation.   I'm recommending # of dead children, since it is rather difficult for even the most radical cult member to claim that children are terrorists, and it is pretty easy to separate the bodies or body parts of dead children from those of dead adults By this measure, Israel is clearly winning, as is the US in their cult war... Go cultists!  Kill for peace!!!  Yay WW3!!!!!
I recently asked a Muslim how to solve the Middle East problem and he came up with the same solution.  This will remove 90% of the thunder from Muslim extreamists.  Combined thatwith the US weaning itself from Middle East oil and a reformation of Islamic thought and we *will* have peace. But first things first.
Go cultists!  Kill for peace!!!  Yay WW3!!!!!
While that might even the playing field, what is really needed is [proportional representation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Proportional_representation).  Good luck getting the GOP and the Dems to give up power to other political parties though.
I agree with his post that "[does] ZDNet just exist to give daft writers a place to blog?".  I don't see a whole lot of great content coming out of ZDNet these days (and they employ Roland Piquieuapilae, of slashdot spamming fame).
The arguments presented are not convincing and not much more than personal opinion. Valid arguments do exist, this just isn't one of them. 
I've got some more: Support for Israel: getting the jews into wars so most of them can be killed as required by the plot of the "left behind" series. Intelligent Design: Medieval epistemology updated for the 21st century. Think Tank: where ideas go after they've been excreted by everyone else. Rugged Individualism: 1. the feeling one experiences while driving an SUV. 2. the financial independence enjoyed by those subsidized by government pork. 3. lazyness subsidized by cheap labor and foreign debt. Family Values: euphamism for religious fundamentalism. School Choice: the right to indoctrinate your children in medieval ideology and have the taxpayer pay for it. 
Buy a clue.  Cults have everything to do with this, and if you think there are civilized countries in the world, you must be cross-posting from a parallel universe.
Why do people go into such rants against Dell?  Because they're the big, dominant computer maker?  I disagree that they aren't about making good hardware.  In my experience, their servers just work.  If you need to take them apart, you don't need tools, because they actually design their cases instead of throwing all the parts together in a cheap box (this is also true of their desktops).  If you buy the "rapid rails" that clip onto racks without tools, it takes all of 5 minutes to rack a Dell server. I think you're paying too much attention to their marketing to let it get under your skin so.
True, but when you have apparent idiots passing worthless legislation what other choice do we have?  I don't like relying on the ACLU to fight legal battles any more than the next man, but I think we're backed into a corner on this one because it's been tagged as "protecting the children" and there isn't a senator in their right mind that's going to shoot it down during an election year...
That's not a bad idea actually, as it would prompt more people to search before submitting. I imagine duplicate entries (including same article, different website submissions) make up a decent percentage of all new stories. Story quality would probably rise as well, since you don't want to lose karma by making mindless submission.  Would there be some type of nirvana, where one does not have to pay the karmic retribution?
so how do you order a pepsi in the south?
Claim their local forces fully able to stand up against new Iraqi Army
No, no.  You're thinking of tubes.
Yes.
The cheesy equivalent of blowfish sushi?
Go go cultists!  Kill for peace!!!  Yay WW3!!!!!
hm. aren't template methods invasive? u need to implement a abstract class / interface, right? with DI u are loosely coupled. i still think ioc rulez :-) 
Compare with what?
No, it's in the article's title, too.  But there's no reference to it anywhere else.
&gt; What do you mean? Ubuntu's packaging system can apply distribution-specific patches just as easily as portage. After looking over apt-get's method of doing this it does seem like much more of a pain to me. You have to write a bunch of boilerplate in comparison, it seems to me. It just doesn't seem "just as easily." And if it is so easy, why don't they have better support for non-x86 arch's? The packaging is too much of a pain for the casual user in comparison. The whole reason that I came to Gentoo was its far superior support for amd64 years ahead of everyone else.
I don't get it.
popular myth
The fact the phrase "useful idiot" cannot be ascribed to Lenin does not make coldwarrior's use of it any less true. I notice you don't criticize the content of the video.  I assume you are comfortable with your role as the moral equivalent of a cow to be slaughtered at the pleasure of any Moslem -- or did you not bother to watch the video and see the leaders of Islam saying such things? Or perhaps you are a Muslim and regard the rest of humanity as mere "apes" and "pigs" (to use the technical Islamic terms for 80% of humanity).
Growing up just west of the great Pennsylvania dialect divide, I was actually a little shocked to see so many respondents claiming to use 'pop' - I'd used it all my life, but I thought it was a strictly Pittsburgh/North Ohio/Michigan thing...
Downmodded for using 110%.
Lots of stuff in it that's both repulsive and funny. Well worth a read (and a laugh) and it's not too long. I lament it never made it to the Christian canon.
&gt; no credible studies have shown significant links between  &gt; video games and violence or aggression except in very young  &gt; children, Furthermore, it's worth noting that the explosion of violent First Person Shooters concided with a huge decline of crime in the nineties.
Yeah, and your constant mouse wiggling is really wasting data cycles, calculating the new cursor position. Knock it off! Some people are trying to download porn!
I find equally interesting the anti-religious fervor with which your (informative) suggestion was downmodded.
it has GOOGLE in the title!1 just press the up arrow!
They mixed up 'Kissing' in the title and half the story, and replaced it with 'kicking'.
A really neat Internet time capsule.  You can share your message with friends BEFORE sealing it away for a chosen duration.  Free too!  I love free!
An excellent explanatory article about intelligent design that is well-worth reading, if you haven't already read it. I also think it should be required reading for all students of biology and science.
&lt;insert super cow power joke here&gt;
Preaching logical arguments is to atheists is what citing scripture is to religious people.  Enjoyable but thoroughly ineffective at convincing the other side. You will never convince emotional people with such arguments unless they were already just barely believers in the first place. Atheists should be using different tactics to sway them.  No longer ridiculing or attempting to make them feel stupid would be a good start.
Responding to developments on the ground, President picks easier fight
Ways the publishing industry can save itself from losing market in the Long Tail world.
It's the popular truth.  They're both methods of installing packages.  Emerge lets you compile with the flags you want.  apt-get gives you the lowest common denominator (typically).  That's not to say you can't compile your own stuff, or even use emerge on a debian system (you can), but still, it's no myth.  Emerge, in context, gives more flexability.
I apologize in advance to all of your Sardinian gourmets out there... but I feel ill, and have to question your sense of edibility.
so it does make sense to compare them.
Everything I've read tells me that spiritual experiences are just a matter of brain chemistry.
As the entertainment industries struggle to find their markets online, here are some suggestions to help them.
The suspension does make sense though.
Surely, a more robust argument is that numbering should start at 0 because in many languages arrays are implemented as an pointer to somewhere in memory plus some offset.  The first element of an array is naturally, therefore, the zeroth. John. 
How do other religions work? Do they pay you upfront?
is this stunning image yet more evidence for global warming?
http://bash.org/?414593 
I have to agree with the judge on this one, as his reasoning is sound. Also, I hope that laws like this are enforced more. BMX and fixed gear bikes without brakes are dangerous, because they can't stop quickly and easily. The point of a brake is not to be able to stop eventually.
They probably wanted to provide the answer in a footnote.
"Traditionally blue state" isn't exactly true - the state overall has a history of voting GOP for general elections and Dem for presidential elections.  We have a republican legislature, two republican senators, and if I'm not mistaken a majority of our congressional reps are GOP as well.  The republicans are just concerned because they saw their margin in the counties around Philly take a nose-dive last election and want to stage some kind of comeback (albeit artificial).  I will just be very curious to see if they actually lose some of their more moderate supporters to this green party candidate since he will be the only pro-abortion candidate on the ticket...
White House vows retaliation over potentially-viable-hostage-taking
you don't.   some chain restaurants sell pepsi.  in those establishments the conversation goes like this.   waitress:  what'll you have to drink, sug? patron:  i'll have a coke. waitress:  oh, i'm sorry, sug.  is pepsi okay? patron:  make it a dr. pepper. waitress:  sure thing. 
Awh, no image available?
Kinkos, man.  Kinkos.
http://www.vecer.si/blog/FOTKE
Screw pipes, have you heard about 'bash'?  Apparently you don't even need to click on anything.  You just type in what you want to do it does it!
You can read this in english [here](http://travel.timesonline.co.uk/article/0,,10295-2294108,00.html) And btw, there is a [french subreddit](http://fr.reddit.com/) 
Read the whole thing again, nimrod.  Slowly.
I also hate phone bills.  Who knows what all those $2 fees are?
I think this is exactly why we should encourage users to identify dupes by posting a comment on the ones posted after the original.  Then, the dupes should be removed by the submitter under the honor system until there's a way to help automate their removal. Or maybe a "dupe" command to the right of "report"?
http://www.heartless-bitches.com/rants/niceguys/niceguys.shtml
Integrated the music system into a chat bot and installing WiMax in the toilet are very good ideas.
"play dirty"? Didn't I see you in another comment thread somewhere complaining that there should be more parties involved in the races?
10 pretty true things women should think about for the dating world - and any good guy would agree
&gt;Or maybe a "dupe" command to the right of "report"? Just have to make sure people don't start abusing it to kill stories they don't like.
cmon guys, this was intended as a joke pandering to reddit's unwavering anti-java attitude.
Not too likely. I don't think anyone except for very small (one-man startup) shops choose their servers based on what's a more familiar desktop environment. I work at a company with a huge install base of Windows machines. On the backend however, we run Red Hat enterprise. It's certified to run Oracle, and until Ubuntu provides a similar guarantee Mark Shuttleworth's distribution won't be gracing our servers.
The problem is what is nice?  I think there is a disconnect between what guys think nice means and what women think nice means. To guys its the actions that count, whereas for women its the attitude and the feeling behind it.  Nice guys have a habit of doing nice things with an expectation in the back of their minds that they will eventually get something in return, which is not the definition of nice.  Women sense it, and then when they don't get what they really wanted all along, their reactions are varied but generally involve anger and indignation, which a woman definitely does not want.
45212176 per google: Pythagorean Natural Number Triples a = n^2 - m^2  b = 2 n m  c = n^2 + m^2    for n &gt; m  So a =(80)^2 - (18)^2  b =2(80*18)  c=(80)^2+(18)^2  a=6076  b=2880  c=6724  (6076)^2 + (2880)^2 = (6724)^2   or   36917776 + 8294400 = 45212176 
&gt;My humble prognosis is that the whole college/university "system" as we know it has less than ten more years. Any ideas for replacing it? The way I see it, parents send their kids to universities based on prestige.  Since you can't just create prestigious universities, the supply can't grow fast enough to meet the demand.  Hence, prestigious universities are attempting to expand.  The system will only collapse when parents stop worrying so much about prestige.
I'd love to see Santorum crash and burn for being an overall fuckhead, but crying foul over this is a little disingenuous. Besides, it's pretty funny that Santorum's camp thinks they can win the election by having this green siphon *that* many votes.
Also, the pages on the hot page shouldn't stay in the new page, they occupy room for nothing.
Why? She's being cheated in competition and I think her protest is legitimate. Why punish/silence her?
&gt; ... a commemorative plaque honoring Rosa Parks next to a sign that segregates the elderly &amp; handicapped from everyone else. I'm sorry... what? Not sure what city you're in, but in Toronto, anyone can sit anywhere. The best seats, however, at the front of the bus, have notices *requesting* that you surrender them for the elderly or disabled. (There was a [series](http://www.metronews.ca/letter.aspx?id=376) [of](http://www.metronews.ca/letter.aspx?id=516) [letters](http://www.metronews.ca/letter.aspx?id=754) discussing this in Metro, recently) **edit**: linked the other two letters
whatever it is, it certainly is not a dumptruck
"'I have friends in all political parties. It's just that my Republican friends are more confident about standing with me than my Democratic friends. And as a group, my Republican friends are a little better off,' he said in a telephone interview." Wow. The Green Party is far more corrupt than I orginally thought.
I didn't think it was that clear. It was clear to *me* that you wanted to know what to pick *next*, despite the reminders in the comments, but expecting to get war stories/pointers? I wouldn't have guessed. After rereading your post, however, I still didn't see that war stories/pointers were what you were really after, so perhaps your question was a bit too open ended.
So...maybe I'm missing something...you need Karma to submit but you only can get Karma by submitting...so how will new users ever submit?
Let's not start a war here..
IBM Rule-based Accessibility Validation Environment (RAVEN) v1.1.0 is a tool for inspecting Java-based, rich-client graphical user interfaces (GUIs) and validating them for accessibility. This update includes simplified installation, configuration, user interface; more integrated and consistent with Eclipse; support for validations through Java and Plug-in Perspectives; and support for Eclipse 3.2.
Granted, the author's experience was unpleasant, but what exactly is "scary" here?
More legitimate parties are needed, yes. This guy is a shadow candidate, and his "party" and backers are by proportion more republican than green. Which is the whole point of the story really.
christian morality: gotta add that one to my list of humorous oxymorons...
Do you assume that her competitor became trans simply to win a race? I am assuming no. Regardless, it would be a bad decision for the organization to ignore a competitor that is spreading anti-orientation hate messages during their event.   
Is "traditionally blue" a euphemism for "now republican"?
Not really. If they don't appear in court, he will win the case.
  They can't win it, because there is no winning.  Sure they can destroy a lot, kill a lot of civilians or even a few Hezbollah fighters, may be even force them out.   This wont be the first time it has happened,  go back 60 some years ago you have http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Warsaw_Ghetto_Uprising In about thirty days the Nazi "finally crushed" the Jewish uprising in Warsaw Ghettos.   At the end to history recalls their Resistance not the Nazi victory.  History is repeating itself in the Gaza Ghettos and Lebanon villages.
Three thugs with a metal pipe and the element of surprise couldn't take him down?  This guy is awesome.
What celebrity doesn't make a fool of him or herself especially when the cameras are rolling, and after all, the news monrels are usually right there.  Celebrities thrive on these stories, good and bad.  Some days, they want to be the good guy and others it is the bad guy.  Alcohol is a controlling vice.  People say thing out of hat without alcohol.  No excuses, though.  The world is a small place, and although it does not matter how big or small this place we live becomes, there is not room for slurs and stereotypes born of bigotry.  Apologize.  It is the first step, then move on and believe that everyone is different.  They are not less or more because of it.  Change is the ultimate answer and it starts with one.  Enough said'  Let's not create another war over it.
that would have to be sorted out obviously :) Maybe make new users start with an initial karma? Or allow for negative karma?
Browsing through the rest of the site... this guy is my new favorite essayist.  heh
Too late;) I would have still been with rpms had I not been made aware of the other options though. Besides, Ubuntu tends get an inordinate amount publicity anyway.
I remember having a discussion over a month ago in which there was the suggestion that people be allowed to submit 1 a day, then for every 50 Karma points you have, you get to submit another. (Again, the exact details can be changed up, but you get the idea) This way people will be forced to think more about submissions, lower spam submissions (like from our friend '[smoker](http://reddit.com/user/smoker/)') and hopefully resolve both the issue of people not searching and what you claim is too many submissions.
How is that a robust argument? The transformation from m-based to n-based adressing is trivial, both for humans and language implementations. Thus, we're only left with human/convenience -type arguments, and, in that light, EWD's arguments in favour of [)-type intervals seem pretty strong.
I prefer [cumulative voting](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cumulative_voting), myself.
I don't like fixed rules like these... Maybe users who have a low point per story ratio could be throttled?
My friends ride fixies, and i just started riding one as well. But, i would never ride breakless. It's way too dangerous. I feel that riding brakeless is almost entirely done to show off. Why risk your safety to gain some street cred, I'm not sure. Kids that ride breakless will argue it all they want, but having a simple front break will never harm anything. My friend is riding breakless for a week now, and i'm scared for his life. Although he's doing it temporarily, i would rather him have front breaks. He's already good at getting hit by cars *with* breaks, i'm worried to find out what happens *without* them.
Right. We don't need open source anymore; we just use websites. (Which we connect to using Firefox, and which are running Apache, MySQL, PHP or maybe Ruby On Rails...) 
Push new stories that have had up/down votes down, and let stories that have had fewer votes float higher on the new page. This subverts the idea of "new" - maybe change the terminology to mean something like "fresh"?  This means that it's sorted not only by how new it is, but how infrequent people have touched it. Submissions by high karma users should float longer than submissions by low karma users (if not many people see it).
Man, does Joel have a week off or something?  No posts for like 6 months and then blammo, 3 or 4 a day! 
Another suggestion: Throttle what we see on the new page based on usage.  If you frequent the new page alot, and have voted on many of them, then show me the new-new stuff.  If I almost never visit the new page, then show me stuff that hasn't really been looked at (but is still pretty new).
What a fuckwad. I am saying this as an admin of Wikipedia, not as a Colbert hater (which I am, too, and I never even watched his shows!).
America is a two party state-- it's deeply encoded in our system. The only way to change that would be something like proportional representation, as one poster already mentioned. Third parties are often used as "sucker bait" by the two major parties to split the opponent party's vote.  The green party appears to be Republican sucker bait. I suspect that Ross Perot was sucker baiting for Clinton. 
&gt;Submissions by high karma users should float longer than submissions by low karma users (if not many people see it). This is contrary to the equality principle that is very high in the reddit values. I highly doubt the founders would implement that.
Can you people report this post? i have.
Not including the linkjacking, that's a pretty apt description of BoingBoing, too.
[Cheese made in America](http://reddit.com/info?id=253q) is much more pleasant.
Sway them? It's not about swaying - people can believe whatever they want to believe. As long as it doesn't make them a threat to society, that is. But when people use illogical or otherwise faulty arguments to defend their beliefs they get called on it. It doesn't matter whether the nutter gets swayed or not - it's about refuting nonsense. Refuting nonsense is a goal in and of itself.
In the South, yes.  Most of the olde tyme "dixie Democrats" are now Republicans, turning many old blue states red. 
The title is kind of dumb, but good points are made. 
I actually saw a math question about velociraptors once. It was for a mathematical modelling competition years ago. Given how well the dinosaur could run and turn and how its prey might react, you were tasked to model how the raptor should run after its prey using game theory.
People still watch TV for news? Wow!
That is our intention, but it's a little but fuzzy because the hot page doesn't technically have an end, it's one continuous stream all the way to the beginning.
&gt; This subverts the idea of "new" - maybe change the terminology to mean something like "fresh"? This means that it's sorted not only by how new it is, but how infrequent people have touched it. That's essentially how 'rising' works, stories get priority based on how many times they've been seen. &gt; Submissions by high karma users should float longer than submissions by low karma users (if not many people see it). It sounds good at first, after all, the high-karma users are who made the site what it is, but we wouldn't want to restrict the ability of low-karma users to gain a foothold.
I understand that. However, what if I want to submit 3 very interesting blogspot.com stories one day?  I'm just saying it should be more flexible.
Men feel NOTHING when it comes to the opposite sex.  They are steely, heartless automatons.
terrorist - noun a person who uses violence and intimidation in the pursuit of political aims.  http://www.askoxford.com/concise_oed/terrorist?view=uk By definition the US military isn't a terrorist organization, neither is Israel’s military.  There are Jewish terrorists too but not by design of the government.  You can argue that Israel and the US have some idiotic policies but not that they are terrorists. One could make a case that hezbollah is made up, in large part, by terrorists.  It also condones the actions of terrorists and their actions against Israel.   
I think a lot of atheists fail to notice that according to Christianity itself, only a tiny fraction of those who pretend Christianity actually have a relationship with God.  You know, all those verses about the path to life being hard to find and hard to follow.  I'm not necessarily a Christian myself, but I hate to see the religion discredited by people like these.
awful story. wow, he worked for some idiots who offered him a shitty office....
I'm from Sacramento, CA and everyone calls it coke. Hell, I go to Stanford, and people there call it coke also.
I meant that foo.blogspot.com gets two, bar.blogspot.com gets 2, and so on.
There's a glimpse of this helicopter here, starting at around 1:44or so:  http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-8587629076215400933
And this one guy swam across the English channel. Doesn't make it a good idea, business-wise, to base the British import/export business on swimmers.
Same here, we use redhat where I work because it is certified to run oracle.  That being said I do use Ubuntu on my desktop though.
I would say that, due to the ephermeral and non-mathematical factors that play into this the odds do, in fact, defy calculation. However, that's true whether they're high or low. :P
&gt;That is our intention, but it's a little but fuzzy because the hot page doesn't technically have an end That's a very good point, and it should definitely stay like that. Thresholds for story promotion like digg has is definitely a bad idea. I'm sure it shouldn't be too hard to find a workaround though. Maybe the hot rank of a page could somewhat decrease its 'newness'?
Time for the Dems to fund some ultra nationalist party. ;)
It's hard to Dijkstra read slowly when we know how rambling he is/was. The amount of irrelevance he gives in this article is staggering. Here's my condensed version: &gt;Denoting ranges of Natural numbers as 0 &lt;= x &lt; N is best for two reasons. Firstly, because the difference of the bounds is the same as the length of the range. Secondly, because ranges fit nicely together.
What happens if the Silnas brothers die? Is the NBA still contracted to pay out the money to *someone*? I also wonder what they're doing with all that money. Environmental activism sounds great, but what have they actually done?
It absolutely should, I don't know why I haven't put it in the few lines to make that work. I'll add it soon.
the language subreddits are pretty much dead though.
Yep, that's why we're both reading reddit now :)  I now know that the stuff I would have clicked on at BoingBoing is going to be on Reddit, so why bother going to their page?
Pray tell, nimrod, what the valid arguments are. Or just give us _one_. One measly argument is all we need.
&gt;Do you assume that her competitor became trans simply to win a race? I am assuming no. I don't think so either, but she did have the advantage of growing up with testosteron running through her veins. Even now she still has a male skeleton which is advantegeous in cycling. I think it is unsporting of her to compete in women's events.   
We made a first attempt a while back, and it worked for a while. It seems a few links find a way to fall through the cracks. We'll come back to it soon and clean them out. Our intention certainly is for links on the hot page to not be on the new page.
And who will pay him then?
Alpha Centauri, anyone?
&gt; This is wrong. Oh, I see. Thanks.
This was right after they removed the Netware network filesystem driver packages for everything but SuSE? Good job.
&gt;In 1982, after several years of cashing TV checks, the Silnas came close to accepting a new buyout. The NBA offered them $5 million over eight years, but the Silnas countered with a demand of $8 million over five. The league balked at that number, so the Silnas have kept cashing in. The NBA was trying to penny pinch.  Silna played his cards right and the NBA should be forced to continue to honor the contract unless they offer a better buyout deal for him now.  $15 million a year is really a drop in the bucket for the NBA.  To put some things in perspective: * 2 of the thirty teams (Lakers and Hornets) combined are worth over $750 Million. $15M is only 2% of the value of those two teams.  * The latest TV deal (ABC/ESPN/TNT) is worth 4.6 Billion (with a B) over 6 years. Silna is estimated to make $24 Million a year from it ($144 Million over 6 years).  That's just over 3% of what the NBA is making. The NBA is just hurt that they didn't buy him out for $8 million in 1982, a mere .17% of the the value of their current 6 year contract.
  This is the result of a broken electoral system.
Santorum is so staunchly rightwing what positions could a candidate possibly take that would siphon votes from him? This strategy assumes that the mainstream candidate has p.o.'d a small but not too small extreme faction of his party and I can't think of who that would be for Santorum.
&gt; Remark: Many programming languages have been designed without due attention to this detail. Ugh. Spare me. As if Dijkstra's half-assed dismissal of 1-based indexing were somehow the final word on the matter and anyone who thinks otherwise is an ignoramus who fails to exercise "due attention to detail". Dijkstra was a smart guy, but his arrogance is obnoxious as hell. Dijkstra's argument is poor reasoning, anyway, and it always annoys me when people reference this stupid note in 0/1 indexing wars. Its basic form is: 1. My pet notion for integer ranges has advantage X  2. Others notion for integer ranges don't have advantage X  3. Therefore, my pet notion is better.  4. Also, my pet notion is better for array indexing, too (because array indices are technically integer ranges) Since he doesn't bother to examine the advantages of any other scheme, his reasoning is invalid and his "conclusion" is worthless. Also, point 4) is a leap. An array's indices, while technically considered integer ranges, also do additional conceptual work, so it isn't a simple matter of carrying over any "conclusions" reached by talking about integer ranges in the abstract. *Both* schemes have their advantages. There are two concepts at work when talking about lists/arrays: 1. The number of elements in the list (cardinality)  2. The position of elements in the list (positioning) The number of elements will always be 1-based, because it is refering to *cardinality*, and 0 already has an established meaning when it comes to cardinality. When looking at a bowl of cherries, if there is a single cherry in the bowl, you say there is 1 cherry in the bowl. If there are no cherries in the bowl, you say there are 0 cherries; if there are 11 cherries, you say there are 11 cherries. 1-based positioning has the advantage that it uses the same concept as cardinality. This is why I think some folks find it more "intuitive". The first element has index 1, and the last element has index equal to the list's cardinality. To extract a sublist containing the first 5 elements, we think of index 5, not index 4. Negative indexing is completely symmetric with positive indexing: -1 is the last element, -size is the first element; 1 is the first element, size is the last element. There's no mental subtraction of 1 anywhere to translate between the two concepts. Now, regarding the advantages of 0-based indexing:  1. The cardinality can be computed by subtracting the start index from the stop index.  2. 0-based indexing fits ranges nicely back to back. 1) is true, but I personally don't find it convincing for two reasons: a) the computed result can't be used as an index: you need to subtract 1 from it (though it can be used as an exclusive upper bound when writing a for loop, but then, the size can also be used as an inclusive upper bound when writing a for loop with 1-based indexing). b) If you can't remember to add 1 when computing the size of inclusive ranges, write a function, `len(a,b)`, which returns `a-b+1`, and always use that when computing the number of elements in a range. 2) is I think the is the more compelling reason to use 0-based indexing. For instance, when writing a divide and conquer algorithm, you choose the divide index, h, and range 1 is `[0,h)` and range 2 is `[h, end)`, rather than requiring the `+1`, which is a little awkward. But I deal with this situation relatively infrequently in my code, so it doesn't really factor into my preference. In summary: not surprisingly, it's a tradeoff, like everything else! I used to be a 0-based advocate, then I switched to 1-based and found I liked it better. There's no need for Dijkstra (or anyone else) to be dismissive of 1-based indexing.
This particular example applies only to Sprint and Cingular.  It does not apply to Verizon and T-Mobile.
Actually I don't find 1-10 more confusing that 0-9, if I must list the first 10 numbers. Counting from 1 to 10 is more "natural" than counting from 0 to 9. So the "naturalness" argument is not valid in my eyes.  One area where it helps to count beginning at zero is for dealing with summations, ie \sigma_{i=0}^n. But even that is not a compelling argument.
